New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Summer 2003 Produced and Funded by: New Hampshire Department of Education, Office of Guidance and Counseling 78 Regional Drive, Concord, NH 03301 603-271-6691 www.ed.state.nh.us/guidance/guidance.htm Governor of New Hampshire Craig R. Benson New Hampshire State Board of Education Fredrick J. Bramante, Jr.
FREDBRAMANTE@DADDYS.COM William C. Boc 31-2006 Dover Wboc@Wbtlaw.Com Ann M. Logan 1-31-2004 Amherst Logans@Sheena.Mv.Com Gail F. Paine 1-31-2004 Intervale Gail.Paine@Cll.Edu David B. Ruedig 1-31-2005 Concord Mruedig@Hotmail.Com Judith T. Reever 2004 Laconia reeverj@metrocast.net Cynthia Wallace 31-2005 Londonderry Ccentre@Aol.Com - Chairperson Term: 1-31-2008
Term:
1-
Term:
Term:
Term:
Term: 1-31-
Term:
1-
Commissioner of Education Nicholas C. Donohue Deputy Commissioner Paul F. Ezen Director of the Division of Career Technology and Adult Learning Paul K. Leather
The Office of Guidance and Counseling acknowledges the generous support of the US Department of Education's Carl D. Perkins funding which provided for the development and printing of this manual.
The Department of Education, in its provision of services, does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, marital status, national/ethnic origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, or disability.
Brenda Cochrane, Human Resources Administrator, has been designated to handle inquiries regarding the nondiscrimination policies: NH Department of Education, 101 Pleasant Street, Concord, NH 03301-3860 (603) 271-3743, email: bcochrane@ed.state.nh.us New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
2
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling:
A Comprehensive Student Development Program Model
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
3
Acknowledgments Contributing Authors for this Edition: Jackie Belanger, Interlakes Jr/Sr High School, Meredith Carol Brook, Interlakes Jr/Sr High School, Meredith James Carr, Consultant, Contoocook Mariane Gfroerer, New Hampshire State Department of Education Gary Goodnough, Plymouth State College, Plymouth Christy Grief, Interlakes Jr/Sr High School, Meredith Jo Hayslip, Career Transitions, Concord Shirley Jacob, Interlakes Elementary School, Meredith Betsy Korn, Nashua School District, Nashua Lynn Merlone, Jaffrey-Ringe Middle School, Jaffrey Janet Wiley, Barrington Fred Williams, Crescent Lake School, Wolfeboro Melanie Zwolinski, Walpole Primary and Middle School, Walpole
Norman C. Gysbers, professor in the Department of Educational and Counseling Psychology at the University of Missouri-Columbia and a national leader in the development of comprehensive guidance, generously contributed much information as well as giving permission for his work to be used in this edition.
We would also like to thank the Florida Department of Education, Division of Workforce Development, for use of information and models from Florida's School Counseling and Guidance Framework, and the National Consortium of State Guidance Leadership, Harry Drier, Executive Director, for format and wording of some sections.
In addition, much of the material in this manual had its inspiration in the 1987 work of Jo Hayslip, Jim Carr, Judy Randall, Daniel Hummel, and Ed Neukrug.
The expertise of so many NH Guidance Counselors has added, over the years, to the compilation of the knowledge and practice contained herein, that we can truly say it is the product of the NH school counseling community.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
4
Foreword School Guidance and Counseling Programs nationwide have evolved, over the past few decades, from a limited service approach toward a comprehensive program approach that supports and enhances school district goals.
Traditionally, guidance services were characterized as crisis driven, positionoriented, and serving special populations only.
Today we know that to be truly effective in preparing students to meet the challenges of the future, Prevention, Early Intervention, and Planned Learning Opportunities for all students must be part of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
Comprehensive guidance and counseling programs that promote student success through a focus on academic achievement, prevention and intervention activities, advocacy, social and individual learning, and career development, provide students with the skills to resolve problems before they become roadblocks.
Every student needs to approach the educational program ready to learn, and this means having the social and emotional skills to benefit from the educational setting.
Individual uniqueness and developmental growth are supported in a comprehensive program approach.
Such programs focus on the development of students to ensure that they gain knowledge, skills, competencies, and personal habits that will help them to be productive workers in a global economic environment, as well as contributing citizens in society.
The results of a comprehensive guidance and counseling program are enhanced when state and local educational agencies work together to form shared language, vision, and expectations.
This implementation manual was developed through the Department of Education with direct input from guidance and counseling professionals throughout the state and across the nation.
State and national models were reviewed, and information recommended by the advisory group, and other school counseling professionals, was written and adapted for this state manual.
This manual presents a method to develop, implement, and evaluate comprehensive guidance and counseling programs in New Hampshire's schools.
It is organized around the standards of the NH K-12 Career Development Curriculum Framework, available from the NH Department of Education, as well as the National Standards for School Counseling Programs (1997) by the American School Counselor Association.
If all students are to benefit from the positive changes occurring in school guidance and counseling programs around the state, parents, teachers, counselors, principals, superintendents, and school boards must understand the organizational structure a comprehensive guidance and counseling programs and its contributions to student achievement and life success.
In order for New Hampshire to sustain this integrated and developmental approach to school guidance and counseling, all stakeholders related to education need to be familiar with and supportive of the program goals.
These goals, in their turn, must arise from and contribute to state and local educational goals.
It is the intention of this implementation manual to assist school guidance and counseling program personnel to self assess their progress in these areas and take the necessary steps to develop toward a Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Program.
Mariane Gfroerer M.A., NCC Office of Guidance and Counseling NH Department of Education
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
5
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
6
Table of Contents Introduction The Comprehensive Guidance and Counseling Impact on Student Achievement and Life Success
Chapter 1: Beginning Issues in Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Moving from a Position to a Program Orientation The Guidance Curriculum and Career Development as an integral part of that Curriculum Teaming with other Program Areas / Connecting with Teachers Developing a Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Program as a Team Effort
Chapter 2: Getting Underway First Steps First Involving Administrators Plan for Success Preparatory Steps for the Guidance and Counseling Staff Involving Teachers Launching the Steering Committee
Chapter 3: Needs Assessment Simplifying the Process Steps in Conducting a Needs Assessment Using Existing Information Conducting a Survey Informal Needs Assessment Methods Using the Results Auditing Your Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Program
Chapter 4: Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Program Elements Guidance Curriculum Individual Planning Responsive Services System Support and Program Development Staffing Patterns: Who Does What? Resources
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
7
Chapter 5: Conducting and Using the Time and Task Analysis Time and Task Analysis Log Time and Task Analysis Summary Sheet Using the Results Examining the Structure
Chapter 6: Program Resources Locating and Activating Resources Integrating Activities into School and Guidance Programs Steps in Developing a Guidance Curriculum Sample Curriculum Unit on Bully-proofing
Chapter 7: Implementing 
Chapter 8: Evaluation School Counselor Evaluation and Supervision Student Outcome Evaluation Evaluating Results of Guidance Curriculum Evaluating the Program as a Whole Sample Evaluation Forms
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
8
Introduction: The Comprehensive Guidance and Counseling Impact on Student Achievement and Life Success The connection between comprehensive guidance and counseling programs and school academic accountability begins with the establishment of academic standards for students.
Academic standards articulate a common core of knowledge and skills that every student should possess.
They define what each student should know and be able to do in a core set of subjects.
In New Hampshire this core set includes Arts, Career Development, English Language Arts, Mathematics, Science, and Social Studies.
These standards provide a solid foundation for future learning and give students, teachers, and parents consistent targets to meet.
Standards form the heart of school improvement.
Academic standards set high expectations that drive curriculum and, when fully aligned with the assessment and accountability system, give schools the information they need to re-evaluate and strengthen their programs.
In 1998, the UCLA Center for Mental Health in Schools published a report to encourage school boards to increase their focus on addressing barriers to learning in America's schools.
The report states that while emphasis on higher expectations, assessment, and accountability is important, it is not enough.
The barriers hindering the performance and learning of students must be addressed through school guidance and counseling programs in partnership with the instruction and management components of the school environment.
Guidance and counseling programs must address whatever interferes with a student's ability to learn, to succeed, and to participate in the learning process.
For this to happen, school counselors must be given the tools to develop the comprehensive guidance and counseling program in their schools.
Student Learning is the Goal of Guidance and Counseling Programs Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Programs set student standards for competencies to be achieved, contain an articulated body of content, and use a variety of strategies to deliver this content to all students.
The program is evaluated and held accountable for its results, as well as for whether certain functions or activities are in place.
The goal of all program content and intervention strategies is learning.
The guidance and counseling program, in collaboration with other programs, is also supports district goals and missions that ensure student learning.
Although the content of school guidance and counseling programs address results such as social and individual adjustment, and educational and career planning, it is how these results enhance learning that supports the existence of the program.
Academic excellence requires personal excellence and the ability of the individual to take full advantage of the educational opportunities available.
Competencies such as study skills, testtaking skills, resource utilization, problem-solving skills, interpersonal and social skills, educational and career planning skills, self-esteem, self-knowledge, career awareness and exploration, employability skills, conflict resolution, communication skills, self management and personal responsibility, and community involvement form a core content of student development programs.
These components of New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
9
the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program are the means to the development of students who are ready to learn and ready and able to achieve high standards.
School Guidance and Counseling Promotes Readiness for Student Achievement How does the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program promote readiness for student achievement? Figure 1 illustrates a pathway model of the elements of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program that shows the relationships between: (1) "Readiness to learn" (the guidance component) and "Learning in the curriculum" (2) "Learning in the curriculum" and "Measures of student achievement" and (3) "Measures of student achievement" and the desired "outcomes of the educational programs."
According to this model, the initial state of "readiness to learn" involves acquiring skills, knowledge, and attitudes that prepare students for learning challenges at each stage of educational growth and development.
Program Components Student Learning and Outcomes
SelfEfficacy as a Learner Career and Life Goals Ready To Learn Academic Learning Skills Classroom Social Skills
Student Learning in the Curriculum
Measures of Student Achievement
Outcomes of Educational Programs
Figure 1: Elements of Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Programs and Their Impact on Student Learning and Achievement and Educational outcomes.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
10
Readiness to Learn Not all students come to school prepared to take advantage of the opportunities to learn from classroom learning environments.
Some lack important knowledge, skills, and attitudes, and this interferes with their capacity to reach their full potential.
In a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program, individual, group, classroom, and curriculum integrated strategies help students bridge this gap to achieve self-efficacy as a learner, career and life goals, academic learning skills, and social skills.
Self-efficacy as a Learner: This characteristic refers to a student's self-confidence as a learner.
High achieving individuals believe that they can master the material presented to them in the classroom through their own personal efforts.
They accept responsibility for their own learning.
They look upon curricular areas in which they encounter difficulty as challenges to be met and seek out resources and assistance when needed.
Career and life goals: This element refers to the capacity for students to relate classroom learning to ultimate purposes in life, to the establishing of a career, and to a place in society.
It requires that students become able to comprehend that learning today will have an impact on career and life opportunities in the future.
Career and life goals provide an important aspect of the motivation to achieve in the classroom.
As students apply their learning, they come to understand the relevance of the curriculum.
This becomes increasingly important as students mature.
Academic learning skills: This aspect is often referred to as "learning how to learn."
It involves study skills techniques, general problem-solving abilities (cognitive strategies), focusing and sustaining attention, and listening skills.
This component also includes the development of skills in time management, reviewing and editing, and test-taking.
Classroom social skills: Modern learning takes place in a dynamic multicultural social context.
Teaching and learning techniques have moved beyond only lecture and listening, to a variety of interactive and experiential strategies that require students to use effective collective problem-solving, self-management, and communication skills.
The number one reason that people in the United States lose their job is the inability to work with others.
Therefore students must learn and transfer classroom social skills to the modern workplace in which the capacity for successful collaborative performance is essential.
Acquiring basic human interaction and communication skills thus becomes an important outcome of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
Reviewing these components, it becomes very clear how essential a strong comprehensive school guidance and counseling program model is to the mission and goals of any school system.
The ultimate purpose of education is prepare students for the future, a future in which they will actively participate in society both for their benefit and the benefit of others.
A collaborative, developmental approach in every school assures this outcome.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
11
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
12
Chapter 1: Beginning Issues in Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Moving from a Position to a Program Orientation A program-focused comprehensive school guidance and counseling program incorporates many of the same specific activities as a position-focused program, such as assisting students with scheduling in a way that optimizes their educational and career path plan, counseling and supporting students in need to help them become ready to learn, and supporting the overall smooth functioning of the school.
However, there is a significant difference between program and position-focused missions.
A comprehensive school guidance and counseling program: ¶ ¶ ¶ ¶ ¶ Is seen as an integral part of the school's total educational mission.
Focuses primarily on addressing the developmental needs of all students as the top priority.
Identifies all students' competencies that relate to their corresponding developmental needs.
Plans appropriate work tasks for the counselor with sufficient time to perform them.
Develops and implements a counseling program which assists all students to select, develop, and demonstrate student outcomes.
¶ Provides counseling for all students at those times when they have special decisions to make or problems to face.
¶ Supports other educational programs, while remaining a separate but equal component of the school's educational mission.
Therefore, a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program displays three important and essential characteristics: 1.
The language describing the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program is focused on student competencies, actions, and knowledge.
In a traditional position-oriented approach, those guidance departments that provide services rely primarily on a description of the services to be provided, but in terms of counselor behavior.
In this case the language is administrative in nature and focuses on tasks the counselor must perform if the school services are to run smoothly.
The description of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program is student-competency oriented rather than counselor position oriented.
The layperson reading this description will have a clear impression of what students will be able to do if the program is successful in achieving its goals.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
13
2.
The counselor role is 100% guidance program focused.
From the first day of school in the fall, to the last day of school at the end of the school year, counselor time is spent implementing a program that has student-based competencies, goals and objectives.
Day to day changes in program activities occur through negotiations rather than as add-ons given to the Guidance and Counseling Department simply because no one else seems to have the flexibility in their daily schedule to carry out new tasks.
3.
Counselors have clearly defined and mutually understood relationships with teachers, administrators, and other staff members.
Through the guidance curriculum, school counselors participate fully in the instructional program of the school.
However, they also have specialized and unique skills in human development and counseling.
Through negotiation, counselors and teachers know how they fit together.
Likewise, school administrators appreciating the diversity of skills and approaches, and can foster creative working relationships among counselors, teachers and administrators.
In the comprehensive school guidance and counseling approach, the major complaint of counselors ­ that they spend too much of their time in activities that they were not trained to perform, and not enough time doing what they were trained to do - is not heard.
The Guidance Curriculum and Career Development as an Integral Part of that Curriculum A comprehensive school guidance and counseling program includes two functions that must not be overlooked or minimized if students are to reach their full potential through their years in school.
The first is that of teaching students, in individual or group sessions, to identify, develop, and demonstrate progress in developmental goals and objectives that the school district has selected as important and age appropriate.
This function now is referred to as the Guidance Curriculum.
The development of the Guidance Curriculum and its learning goals and strategies is determined through a process that is explained in Chapters Four and Six of this manual.
It is specifically aimed at developing and presenting certain learning activities both in and out of the classroom, to help students successfully complete specific guidance objectives that have been deemed vital for them to become fully functioning adults.
In the Guidance Curriculum, teachers, counselors, parents, students and community members have parts to play.
Each of them may act as the primary instructor for a specific learning activity, or along with others, they may contribute by sharing some special knowledge or experience with students.
The second function that a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program highlights is that of Career Counseling and Development, sometimes referred to as career guidance.
Career planning is really life planning - that is, planning one's way through life and toward a successful future.
Therefore, it needs to be addressed in an organized manner in all components of the school guidance and counseling program and as an integral part of the school's educational program.
Chapter Six presents "How to" ideas to help school counselors develop effective comprehensive school guidance and counseling programs that include career development.
Teaming With Other Program Areas and Connecting with Teachers In a position-focused guidance program, an observer might get the impression from the detached physical locations of the guidance area and counselor offices, that the guidance function and the work of the counselors are quite separate from the instructional program of the school.
Where there is a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program, students, teachers, other school staff and New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
14
community members view the guidance and counseling program as an integral part of the school's educational program, and the physical location of the program offices reflect this.
This allows teachers and school counselors to more easily share planning and communication responsibilities.
A change of this type calls for commitment by many school staff members to teaming on major functions and programs.
This teaming produces profound benefits for the school and the students, benefits that are not present in position-focused programs.
However, making the change to a team approach is daunting.
Often, to save time or work more comfortably, individual team members are tempted to focus on their own tasks and "go it alone."
This can lead to a return to the old ways ­ a position-focused program with its limitations and obstacles to success.
It is important that the whole school understands and supports the counselor team approach, and applies patience, fortitude, and support until working together becomes second nature to all team members.
Developing a Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Program as a Team Effort A few beginning steps are helpful in the process of changing from a position-focused guidance program to a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
These include forming an internal steering committee and selecting a committee chair or head.
The steering committee should reflect the collaborative function of comprehensive guidance: all stakeholders should be included.
Representatives from the instructional programs, the administration, support staff, students, and parents result in a strong team that will not overlook important components leading to success.
Leadership of the steering committee is important to focus discussions and keep the momentum flowing while the work continues.
Often, schools select a school counselor, guidance director, administrator, or parent to chair the work of the committee.
It is more important to select someone with leadership skills than to focus the attention on the person who has the most appropriate job title.
The person selected must have a good sense of working in and with groups, must be able to establish a team momentum, and motivate already over-scheduled professionals to go the extra mile.
The Chair will need to understand both school and community environments and the team culture present in the group that makes up the steering committee.
The development and implementation of an emerging guidance and counseling program is highly vulnerable to attempts by individual team members or small groups that may want to establish a program to meet their particular needs.
Remember the goal is to develop a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program that will meet the developmental needs of all students in the various aspects of their lives.
Calling in task-specific consultants to work with local school personnel is very effective.
It establishes a successful foundation when the steering committee involves task specific experts to help with the tasks and to check with the populations that have expectations about the outcomes.
Even though it may involve more time to manage this process, it stands a better chance of helping the school reach its goals without becoming stuck on particular issues or being distracted by the many needs that must be incorporated.
At times, perhaps structured periodically, schools will want an `outside the school' view of their progress and plans.
Some schools have enjoyed connecting with a neighboring school in the `critical friends' model, to obtain input and fresh ideas at points along the way.
Schools can also utilize outside consultants, as needed.
State Department of Education personnel from the Guidance and Counseling Office are available to work with local committees.
Counselor Educators and independent Guidance Consultants are sometimes willing to contract with schools for advice and/or assistance.
Outside consultants from schools that have already implemented some parts of a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program can often be quite helpful, especially when the steering committee needs to hear New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
15
from someone who may have faced the same or similar implementation challenges.
Collaboration during the development stage is the key that will unlock the door to a successful, cooperative future in implementing the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program created.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
16
Chapter 2: Getting Underway First Steps First Guidance and counseling responsibilities need to be clearly defined within any district-wide planning for change.
This means linking the development of a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program to the district's local improvement plan and/or strategic plan.
In accordance with RSA 193-C9, New Hampshire school districts are encouraged to develop a Local Education Improvement and Assessment Plan (LEIAP).
The LEIAP is a written document produced by representative individuals within the school district that describes how the school district plans to build upon and complement the NH state goals of improvement and accountability in education "built upon the establishment of educational standards specifying what students should know and be able to do" as an important element in educational improvement.
The New Hampshire Career Development Framework is a part of this requirement, and should be included as the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program is developed and implemented.
Involving Administrators The building principal's initial and continuing involvement has a great impact on the development, implementation, and success of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
The principal also is the lead person responsible for creating public awareness of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling initiative.
An initial meeting between school counselors and school principal is important to form a shared understanding from the very beginning.
It is the principal whose behavior sends signals to other staff members about the importance of the initiative.
Teachers look to the principal for leadership; they interpret the importance of a new program or strategy by how the principal presents it.
The principal must be out ahead of all, including the counseling staff, in the degree of enthusiasm and commitment to the program.
It is the principal who is most effective in conveying the importance of comprehensive school guidance and counseling programs to the parents and community.
With the principal's continued involvement and support, the program has the greatest chance of success.
The principal and other administrators can help by: ¶ Providing written and verbal ¶ Providing time to counselors the deleting of non-guidance the counselors.
¶ Providing appropriate and comprehensive guidance and support to others inside and outside of the building.
to develop and implement the new program.
This often entails paperwork or administrative duties that have been assigned to adequate facilities and resources to implement the new counseling program.
17
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
¶ Ensuring a valid evaluation of the program on an annual basis according to the written program plan.
¶ Providing the connection to the district school board, which will ultimately need to approve the new program, by keeping them updated and informed about the benefits of change.
Plan for Success Start with open conversation and discussion.
Before you begin to plan, have an open discussion with other professionals in your school to determine the need to move into a comprehensive model for school guidance and counseling.
Make sure that everyone understands that a comprehensive model is focused on helping students meet guidance and counseling needs based upon their developmental stage or level.
Avoid the "delegation of tasks" at this point.
The principal should set the meeting time and place and involve all persons who have a vested interest in the agenda and the discussion that results.
There are several topics that need full honest discussion among staff members who hold differing views.
You may decide to use a facilitator for these initial discussions.
Discussion topics may include, but are not limited to: ¶ The belief that school guidance and counseling is a function of the whole school and intended to meet the needs of all students.
¶ The merits of a comprehensive approach to school guidance and counseling ­ the need for counselors and other school staff members to recognize the importance of the students' educational, individual/social, and career development as a central focus of the school guidance and counseling program.
¶ Views and factual information about the percentages of time the current organizational format of the guidance and counseling program provides to various populations and groupings of students, or how the current distribution of time may actually exclude all populations and students.
¶ Views on whether the current guidance and counseling program primarily serves the developmental needs of all students, and what organizational responsibilities may be preventing that goal.
Preparatory Steps for the Guidance and Counseling Staff Strategic Plan Review Review your school district's local improvement plan or strategic plan.
On newsprint, try to identify as many common themes as you can that connect to, support, or complement your comprehensive school guidance and counseling program, as you envision it.
Confirming the School Counselor Job Description A well-defined job description needs to be developed using the review process that already exists in your district and based on a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program model.
Chapter 7 in this manual, Figure 7-1, is an evaluation of counselor responsibilities based on a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program model.
You may want to reference this evaluation as a guide, if it becomes apparent that the counselors' job description needs to be rewritten and renegotiated through the district's review process.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
18
Achieving a Common Vision Visualize what life will be like when you implement a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program at your school.
Close your eyes for a moment and picture how things will be different - and more positive: ¶ How students might respond in different ways to each other, to their teachers, and to the tasks students are expected to perform.
¶ How teachers might respond as they carry out their assignments with students and connect with parents, ¶ How students might respond to teaching and counseling activities.
¶ How you, as an individual staff member of the school, might respond to students and to other staff members, to parents, and to the community.
¶ How you might identify the guidance and counseling needs of students when you view them through a human growth and development perspective; how might these needs differ from the current guidance and counseling program services? Think of other things that might be different in a guidance and counseling program that meets the comprehensive developmental needs of all students in all aspects of their lives.
Brainstorming for Success There are many questions that need to be asked.
The initial counselor group can identify these questions by considering the following items that are generally accepted as keys to success.
As a team, determine and list your thoughts about these items.
Use a flip chart and tape these thoughts around the room as you brainstorm and share understanding of the various elements.
¶ Have you determined that change is necessary? ¶ Discuss and reach consensus on the conditions that are present in your school or district that suggest or require change.
¶ Identify the challenges involved in carrying out a change process.
¶ Make a commitment to action.
Agree upon and write out the specific items of that commitment.
¶ Identify membership for a steering committee, and convene a meeting.
¶ Develop trust among those who will become part of the steering committee.
¶ Meet with the school board to gain support and secure authorization to develop a written plan for implementing a complete comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
¶ Discuss major resistances that may become barriers to change.
(Adapted from Gysbers 
Assessing the Current Guidance and Counseling Program As you examine your present school guidance and counseling program, ask these questions: Is the program prepared meet the challenges it will face in the next twenty years? Does it truly meet all the guidance and counseling needs of all of the students in the school, or is it addressing only a single priority area ­ college admissions or student crises, for example? Is your program the sole responsibility of the counselor(s), or of the total school staff with shared responsibilities? With your group, discuss New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
19
how your program fulfills the following new expectations for a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
¶ Does your program reach all students? ¶ Is it integrated within the educational programming of the school? ¶ Is it comprehensive in scope? Does it include Educational, Individual/Social, and Career Development goals? ¶ Is it comprehensive in sequence? Does it address the developmental needs of students at the appropriate ages? ¶ Is it outcome based? Do students identify and enhance their guidance learning objectives as they progress through the grades? ¶ Is it more prevention than intervention? Both are necessary, but which one is dominant? ¶ Does it possess a structure that encourages counselors to spend all of their time in counseling, planning, and instruction of guidance outcomes? ¶ Does it use a steering committee as the primary planning group? ¶ Are the guidance and counseling program activities planned, scheduled, and announced ahead of time? ¶ Is the program evaluation based on agreed upon standards and accountable to the school and community? Involving Teachers Teachers also need to be involved in the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program development.
Their involvement and participation can happen at several levels.
Teachers need to be able to see how they might fit into the overall program and they need to be given opportunities to volunteer for active participation in the planning and implementation process.
From the beginning, some teachers will seek or accept a great degree of participation.
But all teachers need to be kept informed and encouraged to participate at a later time.
Often, these teachers who enter later will become more active and the best supporters of this new approach to the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
Launching the Steering Committee Once the decision is made to develop and implement a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program, it is essential to establish steering committee.
The committee's task is to oversee the development and implementation process.
This collaborative team should include all stakeholders: school counselors, principals, teachers, parents/guardians, students, representatives of the community, and school board members.
Although you want most of the steering committee members to be early adopters of the new initiative, you may want to include one or two "show-me" types.
The reason for this is that once they understand what you are trying to accomplish, they will become strong advocates for the program changes.
The steering committee needs to be seen as a "working committee" that assists with important decision-making, promoting public understanding of program priorities, and future program initiatives.
The steering committee has a very significant role in the success of every step of the development and implementation process.
Each member needs to be solidly in support of the work.
(VanZandt 
Choose your committee members carefully and be sure to include an administrator who will represent the process and decisions to other administrators.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
20
Be certain to keep the community informed about the work of this committee.
One highly effective method for accomplishing this communication is to use the local newspaper or a school newspaper that is shared with the community.
Another effective method is public information announcements on radio or television.
As an integral member of the steering committee, the selected committee chair needs to take an active leadership role.
This means that her/his responsibility extends to convening committee meetings, developing agendas, facilitating the meetings, and assuring that written materials are distributed appropriately.
The chair may delegate tasks, but is responsible for seeing that they get done.
Sharing these responsibilities makes excellent use of the committee members.
Long before the first meeting, generate a list of responsibilities to be taken on by the steering committee.
Distribute this list at or before the first meeting and give attendees time to react to it.
The list may include some of the following tasks: ¶ Review written material about the school counseling program.
¶ Discuss feedback from previous needs assessments.
¶ Communicate information about guidance and counseling programs and services to other members of the community.
¶ Present the perspective of the constituent group each member represents.
¶ Participate in National Counseling Week activities.
¶ Offer suggestions and advice about program offerings.
Plan for short meetings with tight agendas, unless you are reviewing extensive documents, and attach any related documents to the agenda.
Be sure that everyone leaves the meetings with clearly defined tasks.
Shortly before the first meeting, think about other agenda items that you will include for first steering committee meeting.
For each substantive item of discussion, the following decisions need to be made: · Who is likely to carry the weight of the discussion on these topics? · How will you utilize the energy of the entire committee to carry forward the tasks need to be accomplished? · How long will the discussion(s) take? · What other questions do you need to ask before you hold this discussion/make decision? · Will the right people with the authority to make the decision(s) be around the table? your will that this
Once the steering committee is up and running, the members will be responsible for planning all phases of the development and implementation process.
Persons selected for the steering committee need to be able to commit to being chairpersons of various workgroups assigned to address particular objectives and activities.
Ideally, counselors will participate as members on each of the workgroups.
Workgroups may be responsible for such activities as: ¶ Developing a philosophy of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program to help the program respond to the needs of the students now and in their future.
¶ Suggesting a structure of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program that is consistent with the program philosophy.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
21
¶ Developing a written plan that aligns with the district's local improvement plan or strategic plan for submission to the District School Board.
¶ Conducting a Time and Task Analysis of guidance and counselor program activities, if needed.
¶ Developing and conducting a Needs Assessment consistent with the philosophy of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
¶ Conducting a Resource Audit to determine current activities that can be considered as part of the program curriculum.
¶ Using the Needs Assessment results to establish goals and objectives for the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
¶ Developing an annual and ongoing comprehensive school guidance and counseling program evaluation.
Including All the Players Now is the time to reconsider the importance of including all the players.
If this is not done from the very beginning, you may need to stop and begin again.
For example, if you have published an article in the local newspaper describing that your district is undertaking the effort to build a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program, and a community member or parent calls for additional information, be prepared to listen to the concerns.
Consider whether this person would be beneficial as a member of the steering committee but, in any case, plan to keep her/him informed.
Implementing a Program in the Midst of Development One frequent concern on the part of many practicing school counselors is that there is not enough time to do what needs to be done in the current program, and re-structuring seems like a way of adding new responsibilities.
Actually, changing from a traditional reactive, position-oriented guidance model to a proactive, comprehensive school guidance and counseling model involves doing things differently and eliminating non-guidance related activities.
A structured program is likely to run more smoothly.
Normal C. Gysbers, national Comprehensive Guidance and Counseling expert, describes this change process as similar to remodeling a home while living in it.
Among other challenges, it's messy, it takes more time, and we're not sure exactly how it will look when it is completed.
On the other hand, we can see the results emerging, we can make needed changes as the project emerges, and we have brought everyone with us along the way.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
22
Chapter 3: Needs Assessment Simplifying the Process A needs assessment is part of the larger processes of decision-making and program planning and serves many worthwhile purposes.
It is a key factor in program development and evaluation, and contributes to program and staff accountability.
It is also a public relations tool, for it provides an understandable and objective communication channel between school and community and among school staff members.
A well conducted needs assessment can serve as a basis for allocation of resources.
As an important part of the planning process, the needs assessment identifies perceived or expressed needs of the school district and its subpopulations.
The needs assessment helps to determine what is already in place to address the concepts of comprehensive school guidance and counseling.
Gaps or redundancies in the current guidance curriculum will also come to light during the needs assessment, and provide an opportunity for new ideas and methods to be tried.
Through needs assessment, counselors involved in program development are able to identify the program categories and student learning outcomes that students, parents/guardians, teachers, and the community believe are important.
It is one basis for the selection of guidance learning activities that are used to help students acquire the necessary skills they need for their next steps.
A needs assessment seeks opinions about the content of a program.
Because you want to know what people's needs are, you need to ask questions about the issues in their lives that are the most important to them.
You also need to make it clear that your program will not be able to address all of the needs that your needs assessment identifies.
Ideally, a complete needs assessment will be administered in the development phase, in the first year of the program and every third year thereafter.
If the surveys developed are relatively brief and easy to administer, they can be administered to 100% of the student, parent, and school staff population in moderate sized schools (up to 500 students).
In larger schools (above 500 students) a 50% random sampling is recommended.
If it is possible to develop an assessment instrument that may be scored electronically, this will save time and effort and useful, accurate results will be quickly available.
The interpretation of the needs assessment results becomes one basis for selecting student guidance learning activities and curriculum to be addressed by the guidance and counseling program.
It is important that the data be interpreted carefully.
By differentiating the responses of parents, teachers, students, and community members, it is possible to determine whether various groups see similar priority needs or whether different perspectives will need to be addressed in program planning.
If each student respondent also identifies her/his grade level, this information will help the committee to create a developmental comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
23
Steps in Conducting a Needs Assessment Utilize a workgroup headed by a steering committee member to:
¶ Provide ways for two-way communication between the workgroup and parents/guardians, teachers, school board, etc.
¶ Establish general areas of student need to include in the assessment such as educational, individual/social, and career development.
¶ Review available data from school records and community agencies.
¶ Obtain a demographic picture of the school district's needs and challenges.
¶ Identify the community's and school's expectations for the school population in each general area assessed.
¶ Collect information about how the current guidance program matches community and school expectations.
¶ Summarize the information collected, avoiding educational and counseling jargon.
¶ Determine in what ways your new program objectives meet community and school expectations.
¶ Identify elements to be assessed and target groups to be surveyed.
Include target groups such as teachers, students, parents, and the wider community.
¶ Organize the community and school expectations into a set of higher and lower priorities ¶ Limit the number of student learning areas to be surveyed.
Focus on those that have been derived from the higher priority expectations of the community or the higher priority areas that require more data for decision-making.
¶ Develop the survey instrument and determine the methodology for the survey.
¶ Write survey questions that will result in a clear idea of differences and similarities between program objectives and target groups' expectations.
¶ Modify wording of items for each target group but, where possible, use similar wording.
¶ If the survey is not applied to 100% of the population of each target group, pay attention to how the sample population is chosen.
A representative sample, randomly chosen, will increase the ability to generalize from the sample to the whole population.
¶ Don't sacrifice ability to follow-up on non-respondents for anonymity.
If necessary, follow up with non-respondents in order to obtain as complete a picture as possible.
Individual phone and written reminders to each non-respondent are the most realistic procedures.
Impersonal reminders placed in newspapers or at key locations around the community and leaflets distributed at gatherings of target groups are also helpful.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
24
Using Existing Information Below is an example of how existing information may be utilized in the needs assessment, in addition to a survey of target groups.
Other examples of useful existing information may be your school's policy and procedures manuals, your school or district's strategic plan or local improvement plan, the results of the statewide testing program, and other local assessments.
All the information needed exists in one place or another; it is the task of the workgroup to collect, analyze, and use the data in the best possible manner.
Activity: Know Your Community Each community has a unique personality and its own set of characteristics, norms, and issues.
Consider the following list of community characteristics.
A good place for the needs assessment work group to start is to review the information outlined in this list, wherever this information may be available, such as the Annual Town Report.
This is one example of the type of background information that will help the group develop a relevant survey tool.
Figure 3-1 Community Information 1.
Descriptive Data · Brief history · Geography · Population · Type of community (value of property, religious make-up, minority 
Occupational and Industrial Data · Type of industry (educational requirements for employees, roles of unions) · Employment rates · Occupational classification · Training programs 3.
Power Structure · Financial · Political and governmental · Educational · Religious · Underlying authority 4.
Services · Related educational and psychological · Municipal (health, welfare, protective, recreation) · Organizations · Mass Communications and media 5.
Attitudes and Values
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
25
· · ·
· (Adapted from Van Zandt, Z. 
Toward education Toward particular schools Toward crimes and morality Concerning social strata
Conducting a Survey Below is a sample needs assessment survey, which shows examples of types of questions that may be included.
However, it is best if each school or district committee creates its own survey form based upon the school guidance and counseling program design and the unique characteristics of the school and community.
Figure 3-2 SAMPLE School Counseling Program Survey The members of the Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Program Steering Committee would like your help in planning the school counseling program.
Please read the directions and give your honest feedback.
Do not sign the survey; just circle whether you are a parent, teacher, community member or student.
If you are a student, please indicate your grade in school.
Parent Teacher Community Member Student (Grade level______)
I.
The following list names some topics that might be addressed in a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
Even though all of these topics may sound interesting or valuable, we are trying to find out what students, parents, teachers, and community members consider are the most important topics.
We would like you to indicate the top 10 topics that you feel would be most valuable in terms of your own needs or the needs of the whole school.
First, read all of the topics.
Then, go back and put the number 1 next to the topic that you feel would be the most important, the number 2 by the next most important, and so on down to the number 10.
Do not list more than 10.
If you have some suggestions that are not on the list, place them in the spaces that have been provided and include your suggestion(s) in your top 10 ratings.
Your lowest numbers will equal your highest priorities.
_____Appreciation of diverse populations.
_____Career decision-making.
_____Coping with difficult situations (divorce, loss, moving, new school adjustment).
_____Dating/relationship issues.
_____Decision-making skills.
_____Exploration of personal goals and aspirations.
_____Family relationships.
_____Help for transfer students.
_____Help with educational planning, graduation requirements, and choosing courses.
_____Help with educational programs for students with learning needs.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
26
_____Help with non-English-speaking students.
_____Help with post-secondary options, admissions, applications, recommendations, and financial aid.
_____Help with students with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.
_____Job-seeking and job-keeping skills.
_____Orientation to guidance and counseling services and how to use them.
_____Peer pressure.
_____Peer relationships.
_____Physical/sexual abuse or neglect concerns.
_____Resolving conflicts and joint problem solving.
_____School adjustment (making friends, getting along with people).
_____School/classroom behavior.
_____Self-awareness and self-concept.
_____Sexual issues.
_____Special enrichment programs (Boys/Girls State, Talent Search, Upward Bound, etc.).
_____Study skills.
_____Substance use/abuse.
_____Suicide _____ _______________________________________________________________ _____ _______________________________________________________________ II.
Program services.
Below is a list of six major service areas of the guidance and counseling program.
After reading the list, circle the number that shows what priority that service area should receive in the school counseling program.
4 Top Priority 4321 4321 4321 4321 4321 4321 3 Moderate Priority 2 Fairly Low Priority 1 Very Low Priority
1.
Counseling Services (individual and group counseling, support groups, referral services) 2.
Appraisal Services (achievement tests, career interest inventories, special needs assessments, personality inventories, portfolios) 3.
Information Services (student records, handbooks, computerized data programs, postsecondary catalogs) 4.
Placement Services (enrichment programs, college admissions, course selection, career advising, referral to agencies) 5.
Consultation Services (conference with parents, teachers, and administrators; student assistance programs) 6.
Curricular Services (organization of materials for classroom teacher adoption, group and classroom presentation of guidance topics) 27
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
Informal Needs Assessment Methods Careful reflection on thoughts and suggestions from counselors, teachers.
administrators, and steering committee members can be valid and helpful.
Consideration of available resources, current related programs, school and district priorities, and even "gut level" feelings help in selecting the appropriate guidance curriculum.
Suggestions of other ways to look for information for your informal needs assessment include, but are not limited to:
¶ focus groups, ¶ open ended questions at meetings of parent-teacher organizations, service organizations, etc., ¶ local newspaper articles, editorials, and letters to the editor that highlight concerns that the school curriculum may need to address, ¶ district policy and procedures manuals, ¶ information from outside programs, such as DARE, that are brought into the school.
Using the Results After the results are gathered, the work group will need to determine what procedure will be used for analyzing and interpreting the needs assessment results.
The group will identify the issues and concerns of each of the target groups surveyed, take note of which results indicate differences between program objectives, including student attainment, and target groups' expectations, and form conclusions about what these differences mean.
Subsequent needs assessment surveys can be compared to previous ones to give information about progress toward desired goals.
It may be helpful to follow some of the steps listed here: 1 Translate the needs assessment data into program statements.
This process began during the design of the survey.
Program statements may be organized under the general comprehensive component headings of Guidance Curriculum (classroom and school-wide activities), Individual Planning (appraisal, advisement, placement, and follow-up), Responsive Services (consultation, individual counseling, group counseling, and crisis counseling), and System Support (research, professional development, public relations, committee work, community outreach, program management, and fair-share school responsibilities).
The work group will want to include the full steering committee in this process.
Translate the needs assessment data into the development of a set of 25 to 30 student outcome statements.
Group these statements under the general headings of educational, individual/social, and career development.
The statements, along with or aligned with the appropriate student competencies from state and national frameworks, become the basis for the focus of the offerings of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
Organize the objectives (student outcome statements program statements from the survey) from #1 and #2, above, into one of the four comprehensive program components.
Design activities that offer opportunities for the above objectives to be met.
For instance, if the parent and community survey reveals that the public would like more information about what the guidance and counseling program offers, the objective of a program newsletter or webpage can be placed under the component of System Support.
28
2
3
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
4
Many of your objectives will likely be focused under Guidance Curriculum, Individual Planning, or Responsive Services.
This is as it should be, as the student's development is the main focus of a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
For each of the student outcomes or competencies included, design activities, or identify activities already in practice, that offer opportunities for student attainment.
Identify areas of the school's curriculum where your team may suggest instruction in the student competencies.
Ask key persons or representatives of key groups to help in the curriculum construction and implementation.
Publicize a clearly written summary of the needs assessment results, and the school's action plan to address these results.
This need not be in great detail, as plan development will take time.
It is better to publicize a timely, easily read summary, than to wait too long.
Show community involvement and seek community support!
5
Auditing Your Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Program Program Auditing: The comprehensive school guidance and counseling program is one that meets the developmental needs of all students.
Once you have conducted both informal and formal needs assessments, gaps or overlaps in your program will be revealed.
These assessments will tell you whether appropriate curriculum for all levels has been included in the program plans, and when, where, or whether counseling/teaching staff include this curriculum in the ongoing teaching and learning opportunities of the school.
This program audit provides baseline information from which you may develop the scope and sequence of your program.
Process Auditing: It is very important to monitor the process by which the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program is emerging.
Putting a plan into place that keeps track of the developing program will enable you to make mid-course corrections.
One example: counselors and teachers are working together to counteract some bullying behavior between the older and younger students in the school.
An excellent curriculum is available that addresses this issue, but it is designed for grades 5 through 8, and bullying is going on elsewhere.
How do you provide activities to meet the needs of all the students without being repetitious? What other curriculum units are available which address this issue? They may not be titled bullying, and yet some teachers/counselors may have been using them successfully.
As your process builds into a developmental and sequential curriculum, it will be very helpful to keep a chart or graph that places the themes and activities in plain sight.
This will allow you to build seamlessly on previous activities, thus eliminating gaps and overlaps.
Product Auditing: If a student who leaves school on a successful note can be considered our final product, how do we measure success? For many years, schools used percentages of students graduating from high school as the major criteria for success.
We need to pay attention to other factors including, but not limited to, next-step career plans.
One great way to address this issue is to use life/career portfolios, which students develop throughout their school experiences and carry with them after high school.
Another system is a competency-based electronic portfolio, in which student growth, proficiency and mastery can be seen, heard, and viewed over time.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
29
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
30
Chapter 4: Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Program Elements The ultimate goal of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program is to assist all students to benefit from their educational opportunities.
This enables them to become fully functioning adults who have developed their talents and abilities and are able to demonstrate them for themselves and for their society.
There are four program components that need to be considered in order to successfully carry out a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program: 1.
2.
3.
4.
Guidance Curriculum Individual Planning Responsive Services System Support and Program Development
Each component addresses the guidance needs of all students and together these four provide the framework for the guidance and counseling program.
The identified needs emerge from the stages of development that all students pass through in their progress from childhood to adulthood.
As they pass through these stages, their needs become affected by the expectation that all students will eventually become members of the workforce, participating in either paid or unpaid employment.
This expectation calls for education and training to enable students to eventually participate fully as self-reliant, contributing citizens.
Each of the program components has a set of expected counselor activities, but also allows counselors to respond to special events, problems, and needs in students' lives.
Certified school counselors, often in collaboration with teachers, implement activities with support and assistance from administrators, students, parents, and other school personnel.
Each component focuses its mission on helping students acquire the skills and knowledge designed for their grade and ages.
1.
Guidance Curriculum The guidance curriculum is a designed and agreed upon set of structured experiences for students.
These experiences are systematically presented in a logical sequence through classroom, group, and individual activities.
The objective of the curriculum is the students' attainment of specific competencies.
These competencies are arranged to reflect developmental needs at each developmental stage.
In the NH K-12 Career Development Curriculum Framework, these types of competencies are organized into three major developmental areas: educational, individual/social, and career.
Student New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
31
competencies from the NH Frameworks, the ASCA National Standards for School Counseling, the National Career development Guidelines, and any others developed through the needs assessment process and specific to the school population's guidance needs can be organized in the same way and listed by grade level.
This results in draft guidance curriculum outline.
Figure 4-1 Comprehensive Guidance Program Elements
Content
Organizational Framework
Resources
Competencies Student Competencies Grouped by Domains and Specified by Grade Levels
Structural Components Definition
Program Components And Sample Processes Guidance Curriculum Classroom Activities School-wide Activities Individual Planning Appraisal Advisement Placement Follow-up Responsive Services Consultation Personal Counseling Crisis Counseling System Support Research 
Professional Dev. Staff/Community Public Relations Committee/Advisory Community Outreach Program Management Fair-Share Responsibilities
Resources
Human
Rationale
Financial
Political
Suggested Distribution of Total Counselor Time/Percentage Rate Elementary School 35 ­ 45 5 ­ 10 30 ­ 40 10 ­ 15 100 Middle/Junior High School 25 ­ 35 15 ­ 25 30 ­ 40 10 ­ 15 100 High School 15 - 25 25 ­ 35 25 ­ 35 15 - 20 100
Guidance Curriculum Individual Planning Responsive Services System Support
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
32
From Gysbers and Henderson.(2000) Developing and Managing Your School Guidance Program.
Page 53.
A school-based guidance curriculum is understood in two ways.
Broadly, it refers to all the programs and activities conducted by the school staff and others to help students attain those guidance competencies that will meet their developmental needs.
In this sense many, if not all, teachers are already informally engaged in the guidance curriculum as they carry out their instructional programs.
Identifying where the guidance activities are already being taught is the first step to developing and structuring a formal guidance curriculum.
Those teachers are encouraged to continue; some of them will be the first volunteers to assist in the more formal and structured guidance curriculum.
In a narrower sense, guidance curriculum is a more formal and structured component of your comprehensive guidance program, and is viewed as similar to the English language arts, mathematics, science, social studies, and other curricula of the school.
School counselors need to serve as the major proponents of the guidance curriculum, but not to the exclusion of others.
The success of the guidance curriculum depends on the degree to which it is "owned" by the total school community.
2.
Individual Planning Individual planning consists of activities that help students plan, monitor, and manage their own learning and their own educational, individual/social, and career development.
The focus is on assisting each student to develop, analyze, and plan educational, occupational, and individual pathways.
This individual planning action usually originates in classroom and group activities, but eventually it becomes the focus of individual sessions with a counselor, teacher/advisor, or career development facilitator.
Individual planning includes an annual review of each student's life-career plan and is often, but not necessarily, connected with the student's course selection.
Individual planning is implemented through such strategies as: Individual appraisal of talents and achievements Counselors assist students to use self-assessment information, along individual/social, and career and labor market information to plan for and realize involvement of counselors with students, parents and the school in developing a meets each student's needs is a critical part of both the individual appraisal advisement activities.
Examples of student goals that call for individual planning limited to, the following: with educational, their potential.
The life/career plan that and the continuing include, but are not
¶ Identification of abilities, aptitudes, interests, and achievements that may be useful in future life/career planning, ¶ Identification of possible careers for further study, exploration, or training, ¶ High school and college course selection and development of a life/career plan, ¶ Selection of in-school and out-of-school activities relevant to the life/career plan.
Placement and follow-up
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
33
Counselors assist students in their transitions from one educational level to another, from one school to another, or from school to work.
In order to provide for the needs of all students, counselors focus on providing access to information, advising, helping to establish linkages, counseling in the event of intra-personal conflict, and referral.
Using portfolios One excellent method of assisting students with individual planning is the use of portfolios.
Many elementary and secondary schools today are either developing their own portfolios or adapting ones that have been developed and tested by organizations such as the National Career Development Association or the American School Counselor Association.
Portfolios are a valuable tool in the hands of students.
The portfolio represents the student to her/himself and helps to represent the student to the world.
For example, records of how students make course selections based on career awareness and exploration may be included to remind the students on what basis these decisions were made.
They may use these portfolios to communicate with parents and others by sharing their work in a positive manner.
They may store individual assessment and appraisal results and awards and commendations of any kind in the portfolio for future reference.
Portfolios of the course of individual planning are extremely useful as students transition from school to other goals in higher education and/or the world of work.
As mentioned earlier, electronic portfolios are even more portable.
3.
Responsive Services The responsive services of counseling, consultation, and referral are designed to meet immediate needs and concerns of all students.
Certified counselors have special training and skills to respond effectively, knowledgeably, and in a timely manner.
However, the cooperation and support of the entire staff is necessary for the success of this component.
Responsive services include: Individual and small group counseling In small groups and with individual students, counselors engage in a process of supportive counseling that can range from simple information sharing to interactions that may include problem solving and decision-making.
Other interactions may have preventive and assistance goals.
In general, there are two major reasons for providing individual/social counseling to students: to give short term assistance to those students who are involved in chronic or repeated situations which may present barriers to their school or future career performance, and to provide follow-up assistance to students, individually and in small groups, as a complement to curriculum activities, in order for them to attain their developmental life/career expectations.
Educational development Educational developmental needs that school counselors address through responsive services include student adjustment to school or to the classroom expectations, and assisting to instill desirable and effective study habits or skills, among others.
The focus of responsive services in the realm of educational development positively affects interactive communication skills, problem-solving skills, and skills in self-management.
These tools, or standards of learning, help students to take advantage of the learning opportunities offered.
Individual/Social development New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
34
This area encompasses self-understanding and the understanding of how to work with others.
Management and resolution of student conflicts with peers, family, teachers, and other authority figures, shyness in classroom responses, and apparent low self-esteem, are examples of the issues that school counselors address in individual and social development.
Career development Career development helps students to better understand themselves and their world as they progress through the educational environment and transition to adult life.
Some examples of responsive services in this area include, examination of intra-personal obstacles that may hinder students from understanding and realizing full potential, and assisting students to develop the ability to set goals, consider options, and make decisions.
Crisis counseling Counseling and support are provided to students and the school community facing emergency situations or traumatic events.
Crisis counseling is normally short term and temporary in nature.
Some crises may call for an immediate involvement of community agencies either because of the scope of the crisis or because of the work commitment of the counselors.
Although it is recommended that each school/district develop a crisis team which includes relevant school personnel and representatives from community agencies, it is likely that the school counselors will be involved in some way when a crisis occurs.
It is also extremely important for every school to develop and be able to implement a plan to cope with an unexpected and disastrous event that may be overwhelming.
School counselors have a responsibility during the implementation of the crisis plan consistent with their role and expertise.
Consultation School counselors consult with students, parents, teachers, other educators, and community agencies.
There are many and varied circumstances that call for consultation.
The consultation that happens as a responsive service generally occurs when the situation or problem faced by a student calls for more than individual supportive counseling or simple referral to an outside agency.
Consultation with a student provides the opportunity to share information that could help the student, devise strategies of personal intervention when such intervention is appropriate, and assess and evaluate the results of a personal intervention undertaken earlier.
Consultation with school staff can help to enhance effectiveness in working with students and parents.
Consultation with parents can help them to communicate more effectively with school staff or children.
Consultation with community agencies can help families obtain assistance for some particular situation.
School counselors do not engage in consultation unless the appropriate permissions regarding confidentiality have been obtained.
Referral Counselors often refer students and their parents to community agencies.
This works more smoothly when the guidance and counseling program has developed an easily accessed and annotated list of the referral resources available in the community.
Even more important is maintaining this list, continually updating it, and developing formal and informal relationships with members of these agencies.
At any given time, a counselor needs to be able to call the appropriate agency and, without breaking confidentiality, consult on a situation or presenting problem.
As school counselors become aware of and committed to providing for the needs of all students through a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program, they must identify and use more of the existing community resources.
4.
System Support and Program Development New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
35
System Support and Program Development consist of management activities that establish, maintain, and enhance the total comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
Activities in this component provide support both to the guidance and counseling system itself and to the school system as a whole.
This component is carried out through activities in the following areas: Research and Development Guidance program evaluation, follow-up studies, and the continued development and update of guidance curriculum activities are three of the research and development activities that are constant and ongoing.
Professional development School counselors need to be involved regularly in updating their professional knowledge and skills.
This may involve participation in school in-service training, attending professional meetings, completing post-graduate work, and contributing to professional literature.
Teachers also need staff development involvement to help them carry out their role as a member of the guidance curriculum team.
State re-certification in school guidance counseling requires a professional development plan that is consistent with local improvement goals and with increasing expertise in the field of school counseling.
Participation in professional development activities must be documented and verified.
Specific information is available at the Department of Education website: www.ed.state.nh.us/Certification/teacher.htm.
Staff/Community public relations Orienting the school staff and the community to the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program through such means as the use of newsletters, local media, and school and community presentations, is the main focus of staff and community public relations.
It also includes parent involvement activities, and activities designed to increase parents' and community members' knowledge of and comfort in attending school guidance and counseling sponsored events.
Community/Advisory Boards Serving on departmental curriculum committees and community committees or advisory boards are examples of activities in this area Community Outreach Included in this area are activities designed to help counselors become knowledgeable about community resources, employment opportunities, and the local labor market.
This may involve counselors visiting local businesses and social service agencies on a periodic basis, or hosting visits to the school.
It also includes connections with community agencies for setting up networking and referral linkages.
Program Management and Operations This area includes the planning and management tasks needed to support the activities conducted in a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program, such as reviewing and updating budget, equipment, and facilities needs.
Fair Share Responsibilities All members of the school staff have a share of responsibility in ensuring that the organization runs smoothly and efficiently.
Fair share responsibilities may not have a direct connection to activities New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
36
that school counselors believe are related to their training and expertise.
However, they do afford school counselors an opportunity to observe, interact with, and form relationships with students in various settings.
An example is `lunch duty'.
Although this is not a counseling activity, many school counselors use this time to connect with students informally and create friendly connections between and among students.
Fair share responsibilities should not require a disproportionate amount of the school counselor's time, or the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program will suffer.
Staffing Patterns: Who Does What? In figure 4-1 is a chart called "Suggested Distribution of Total Counselor Time/Percentage Rate".
This chart suggests the best practice in allotting time for particular aspects of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
Of course, schools will vary depending on their specific needs and challenges, but if they veer too far from the recommended percentages, they run the risk of losing the comprehensive nature of the program.
Too often, one aspect of need will take precedence until others are almost excluded.
When this happens, it is a signal or `red flag' that staffing patterns are out of alignment and some discussion and re-negotiation needs to take place.
Solutions may include hiring a paraprofessional for the non-guidance but guidance-related duties, developing a community-agency collaborating crisis team to assist with unusual, severe student crises, more counselor/teacher teaming for guidance curriculum delivery, hiring of counselor/therapists on a yearly contracted basis for specific IEP-designated therapy, and forging close, collaborative ties with several community counselors and agencies for referral of the students needing long-term therapy.
The New Hampshire Code of Administrative Rules (Ed 306.17, 1996), which has the force of law, specifies exactly the caseload ratio of students to school counselor.
For elementary schools, the ration is 500 students per full time counselor.
This means that if an elementary school has 600 enrolled students they need one full time counselor plus another counselor one day a week.
For middle/jr. and high schools, the staffing ratio is 300 students per full time counselor.
These ratios are part of the minimum standards for school approval and must be implemented by the local school boards.
The ASCA national recommendations for student/counselor ratios is 250/1.
Many national research studies have shown that counselor/student ratios of 225/1 result in increased academic achievement by students.
In the percentage chart, the time spent in the various comprehensive components varies according to grade level.
These designations, which are acknowledged nationally, were based on developmental needs.
For instance, the guidance curriculum is allotted a greater proportion of the counselor's time on the elementary level than it is on the high school level.
This is because individual planning, which includes appraisal, advisement, placement, and follow-up, comprises a greater proportion of time in the higher grades.
This individual planning builds on the foundation that the guidance curriculum of the lower grades has established, by assuring that students have the educational, personal, interpersonal, and social skills they need to take advantage of college and career development activities through individual planning.
Resources Human Although counselors are the main providers of and coordinate the comprehensive guidance and counseling program, the involvement, cooperation and support of the teachers, administration, and other school staff members are key elements of a successful program.
In addition, the involvement, cooperation, and support of parents, community members, and business and labor are critical for full student participation in the program.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
37
Financial The financial resources categories required for a successful program include budget, materials, equipment, and facilities.
Just as any program area in the school requires a budget, so does the school guidance and counseling program.
This budget is needed to fund and then allocate those funds across the buildings and grade levels within the district.
Materials and supplies are needed so that guidance and counseling activities can be fully implemented throughout the program.
A comfortable and private room for individual aspects of the program, and a community space for group aspects is also needed for the implementation of a comprehensive program.
Political The political resources of a comprehensive guidance and counseling program include district and school board policy, state and federal regulations governing education, and professional association statements and standards.
Clear school board policies are needed for the successful operation of school guidance and counseling programs.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
38
Chapter 5 Conducting and Using The Time and Task Analysis The time and task analysis serves as a valuable resource.
It is positive evidence of how time is spent in the guidance program.
This is extremely useful when auditing the program to investigate how much time is spent on non-guidance duties and where adjustment of time spent on various components needs to be made.
It is a communication tool, with concrete, observable evidence, that helps focus discussions on negotiating duties and time.
Once a comprehensive program is established, the periodic time and task analysis serves as an accountability tool.
This method is an option if a time and task analysis is useful to your process.
If doing the time and task analysis prevents moving forward with the rest of your implementation, please consider which starting points for implementation of change are most important to benefit your particular school system! It is most beneficial to begin the time and task analysis early in the school year ­ as early as the guidance responsibilities begin.
Since many guidance programs begin with an out-of-school planning session in late summer, even before school opens, this is a good time to start recording time and tasks.
The analysis may begin at any time of the year, however, as the recording of time and tasks would continue until a full year's analysis had been accomplished.
A sample recording sheet is included for convenience and a self designed record sheet would work just as well.
The example included in this manual covers much more than a regular school day, in order to capture the important after-school work done through the guidance program.
While this record will demonstrate that there are evening obligations, it may also bring to light workload issues that require constant extra hours.
Before beginning this recording and analysis, the guidance staff and the steering committee should replace the "examples of activities" with specific activities that your program accomplishes.
Determine which activities belong in which cells, using a brainstorming procedure.
Agreeing ahead of time and checking in as you progress will save a lot of time and make your final report more credible.
It's a good idea to keep all stakeholders informed of this step and of what you are trying to accomplish through the time and task analysis.
Consider using these steps as you conduct your time and task analysis: New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
39
¶ Select one day a week for the entire school year, 36 days in total.
A clear way of organizing is to start with a Monday on one week, continue on a Tuesday for the second week, and so on.
¶ Use the Time and Task Analysis Log to keep track of the time you spend in various activities, at 30-minute intervals.
Although check marks will suffice, little notes or abbreviations in the cells will result in a more specific picture of the work.
¶ Count the total number of 30-minute daily blocks of time for each school day that is being logged.
Do not count times when you were not on duty, for example lunch or personal errands.
¶ Next, count the number of 30-minute block intervals for each category.
Record these figures in the appropriate cells in the time block totals at the bottom of the log.
Then calculate your percentages for the day in each category by dividing the total daily category blocks of time by your total daily blocks of time.
¶ On the Time and Task Analysis Summary sheet, record the number of 30-minute blocks of time for each of the 36 weeks of the school year, or at the end of each grading period.
¶ At the end of the Time and Task Analysis Summary sheet, total the blocks of time by category.
Calculate the percentages of time spent in each category.
Do this by dividing each total category block by the grand total number of blocks.
Try to keep your work on the same page for tallying purposes.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
40
Day______ Date______ Categories Examples of Activities Guidance Curriculum Structured and Unstructured Classroom or Group Activities, etc.
Individual Planning Individual Advisement, Placement, Career Plan Development, etc.
Responsive Services Individual or Small Group Counseling, Crisis Counseling, Referral, etc.
System Support Program Management, Staff and Professional Development, Advisory and Committee Involvement, Guidance Record Keeping, Etc.
Administrative 
7:30 ­ 8:00 8:00 ­ 8:30 8:30 ­ 9:00 9:00 ­ 9:30 9:30 ­ 10:00 10:00 ­ 10:30 10:30 ­ 11:00 11:00 ­ 11:30 11:30 ­ 12:00 12:00 ­ 12:30 12:30 ­ 1:00 1:00 ­ 1:30 1:30 ­ 2:00 2:00 ­ 2:30 2:30 ­ 3:00 3:00 ­ 3:30 3:30 ­ 4:00 4:00 ­ 4:30 4:30 ­ 5:00 5:00 ­ 5:30 5:30 ­ 6:00 6:00 ­ 6:30 6:30 ­ 7:00 7:00 ­ 7:30 7:30 ­ 8:00 8:00 ­ 8:30 8:30 ­ 9:00 Time Block Totals % Totals
Time and Task Analysis Log ­ 30 Minute Intervals
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
41
Time and Task Analysis Summary Sheet First Half of School Year Guidance Curriculum School Year Week Number 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 Totals for First Half of School Year Percents for First Half of School Year Number of 30 minute blocks Individual Planning Number of 30 minute blocks Responsive Services Number of 30 minute blocks System Support Administrative And NonGuidance Number of 30 minute blocks
Number of 30 minute blocks
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
42
Time and Task Analysis Summary Sheet Second Half of School Year Guidance Curriculum School Year Week Number 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 30 31 32 33 34 35 36 Totals for Second Half of School Year Percents for Second Half of School Year Year's Totals Year's Percents Number of 30 minute blocks Individual Planning Number of 30 minute blocks Responsive Services Number of 30 minute blocks System Support Administrative And NonGuidance Number of 30 minute blocks
Number of 30 minute blocks
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
43
Using the Results Even with just a few weeks of Time and Task Analysis, changes needed in day-to-day operations begin to emerge.
If, through the steering committee, the school and community have been kept aware that changes are planned, small steps toward this change can occur immediately.
At the New Hampshire School Counselor Association Fall Conference in October 1999, Norman Gysbers said, "If you do not attend to the structure within which you work, it will attend to you."
By working with the steering committee and ensuring that all school guidance and counseling staff agree on these changes, small changes applied early on allow the group to "test the waters" and fine tune long-range plans.
Activity: Best Use of Counselors' Time Working with the steering committee, try to determine, from the Time and Task Analysis information, if the activities listed are the best use of the counselors' time.
Among the list of activities will be counselor-specific duties, professional duties, fair-share responsibilities, and non-counselor/nonprofessional duties.
When examining the fair-share responsibilities, those duties that assist the smooth running of the organization and in which all staff members have some share, strive for balance.
If possible, make those in which school counselors are involved as non-disciplinary as possible, so that when counselors meet with the students in class, group, or individual counseling, they are not perceived as antagonists.
The steering committee should assist to determine a list of fair share responsibilities.
Carefully examine the information to identify non-counselor/non-professional duties listed in the Time and Task Analysis.
For each one, discuss, within the steering committee, who else might take on or share in this responsibility? What would they have to give up in order to do this? What professional activities could the counselors spend time on if these identified responsibilities were given up or shared? If, in the final analysis, it is determined that the school counseling staff are the only ones in the school prepared to conduct a particular responsibility, can a way be developed to do it more efficiently? Ask your advisory committee to brainstorm with you some solutions to this challenge.
You may want to create a grid similar to the one in figure 5-1 to begin to address these issues.
Figure 5-1 School Management Tasks Program/Tasks Check numbers of courses chosen Write letters of reference Test individuals Ave.
Time 6 days Recommended D Nature of Task Clerical Who else in addition to counselors? Secretaries
8 days 5 days
S S
Professional Professional
Teachers Teachers
D = Displace (give up to other(s) ; S = Streamline (share, or do more efficiently) Adapted from Northside Independent School District, San Antonio, TX, in Gysbers 
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
44
Examining the Structure When the percentages of the Time and Task Analysis have been calculated, they can be compared to the recommended "Suggested Distribution of Total Counselor Time/Percentage Rate" in figure 4-1.
This analysis can be shared with the steering committee to stimulate thinking about necessary revisions and reorganization in the structure of the guidance program.
Once the information is collected, it should be communicated in a format that clearly demonstrates the needs of the program.
If the school guidance and counseling staff and the steering committee have been able to chart the activities accomplished within the four dimensions of the school guidance and counseling program and, at the same time, agree upon those activities that are clearly someone else's or a shared responsibility, they will be able to move on to the next step of designing the new structure.
Figure 5-2 gives you a method for charting your new responsibilities.
Projected on an overhead or in a power point presentation, your descriptive dialogue will be very convincing.
These conversations and negotiations of structural change may happen over time, and the results will become a part of the comprehensive plan.
It is helpful to think in terms of "less of" certain things and "more of" other activities, in order to reach a balance in the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
Figure 5-2 Time Changes Needed to Fully Implement A Comprehensive Guidance and Counseling Program Elementary School Current Middle School High School Desired
Desired Current
Desired Current
Guidance Curriculum Individual Planning Responsive Services System Support Non-Guidance
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______ ______
______ ______
______ ______
______ ______
______ ______
______ ______
Adapted from Handouts by Norman Gysbers at the New Hampshire School Counselor Association Annual Conference, October 1999.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
45
The change from the current structure to the proposed structure requires careful planning.
There are several steps that help to divide a big task into manageable components, listed below.
This is not an exhaustive list.
Each school may have a process that includes steps important to their particular educational community, and individualization of this process is encouraged.
1.
Compare your present time and task analysis to the proposed program time allocations.
Note the discrepancy between the under-served and over-subscribed.
Within each component, isolate those activities causing the discrepancy.
2.
Plan activities to bolster under-served components and to reduce activities in over-subscribed components, following the suggested time allocations for each component.
3.
Note those non-guidance administrative activities you are providing and the time they consume.
4.
Propose methods for removing non-guidance activities from the present program so that the counselors' time can be better used in the new proposed program.
Administrators need to be included in this step.
5.
Specify the changes needed to implement a comprehensive guidance and counseling program, and develop a plan to accomplish program improvement.
6.
Develop a timetable for implementation of the proposed program and removal of non-guidance activities.
7.
Present the information through your steering committee to your administration, and through your administration, to your school board and through your school board to your community.
8.
Begin building-level program improvement, keeping everyone informed about these changes through your steering committee and any other means that you have at hand.
9.
Expand the leadership base appropriate to the needs of your emerging program.
As you make the transition to the newly designed comprehensive school guidance and counseling program, communication skills are a highly important tool for success.
Working With Your Administration About Your Guidance and Counseling Needs Administrator involvement is critical to the successful implementation of a comprehensive program.
Counselors need to foster a climate of professional rapport and gain the support of their administrators for the development of their program.
Build professional relationships with administrators and practice the following : ¶ Develop and maintain a trusting relationship with your administrator by demonstrating your professional knowledge and skills.
¶ Listen well and carefully to recognize areas of need identified by the administrator.
¶ Articulate the connection of a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program approach to addressing school needs/goals.
¶ Provide research-based information relating the success realized in schools with fully implemented comprehensive school guidance and counseling programs.
¶ Articulate the program's alignment with national and state standards.
¶ Share the benefits of a comprehensive program for all stakeholders (students, parents, teachers, and community) with your administrators.
¶ Model the integration of guidance curriculum within the existing curriculum (English Language Arts, Mathematics, Science, Social Studies, and others) in your school.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
46
¶ Increase awareness of the New Hampshire Career Development Framework and identify its connection to your comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
¶ Collect data to support the need for a comprehensive program and its usefulness in meeting school/student needs (referrals, attendance, discipline, counselor activity log, academic achievement, parent/community concerns, etc.)
Above all, school counselors need to consider awareness as a process that needs continued attention, to recognize the effects of change on individuals and the school, and to continually invite and involve administrators in the process of developing and implementing a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program ­ pointing out the benefits to all along the way.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
47
Chapter 6: Program Resources There are at least five critical areas of resources that must be provided if your comprehensive school guidance and counseling program is to move from a position orientation to a program orientation.
These areas include: Steering Committee, Staff Assignments and Staffing Patterns, School Counseling Materials and Equipment, Program Facilities and Space, and the School Counseling Budget.
The first two address the human resources that assure smooth operation of the program goals.
The second two areas listed are the material and space considerations that enable the work to be accomplished.
Locating and Activating Resources Personnel and Support: Steering Committee: This committee consists of members who have broad insights into the local community and into parental expectations for students, as well as the various needs of the school community.
Because this is also a working committee and will divide into task groups, individuals need not only special talents and expertise, but also willingness to tackle and remain with special assignments until they are completed.
Although the steering committee may meet as a whole only once or twice a semester, subcommittee task groups may meet as often as once a week.
One way to develop steering committee coherence is for the committee as a whole to identify the tasks that need to be done, and then to insure that everyone on the committee is a member of a task group.
If it turns out that an identified task is not being addressed, the committee may want to add individuals with expertise in that particular area.
Tasks to be addressed may include, but are not limited to: Needs Assessment Resource Assessment Community Advocacy Program Evaluation Curriculum Development Staff Assignments and Staffing Patterns: Four factors need to be kept in mind relative to the successful management of a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
1.
Participatory management practices are recommended.
This approach to management is based on the premise that employees are more enthusiastic and produce more efficiently if they have a role in solving problems and making the decisions that they will carry out.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
48
2.
Counselors with management responsibilities require a lower counselor to student ratio.
When the program management function is assigned to a counselor, the expectation is that the student case load of that counselor will be reduced to whatever level is appropriate for effective management, and that no other counselor will assume a case load that exceeds that required by the New Hampshire Code of Administrative Rules.
3.
Staffing the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program includes sufficient administrative assistant or clerical support to enable the program to achieve its objectives.
Over time, professional counselors in a school setting can `collect' duties that are best completed by support and paraprofessional staff.
School districts will find it most cost effective to ensure that the program has sufficient support staff for the completion of these responsibilities.
Guidance program paraprofessionals and secretaries fulfill essential roles and also need support in the form of clear and uncluttered job descriptions.
As with counselors, secretarial time assigned to the guidance program needs to be spent on tasks that lead to attaining guidance program goals.
4.
Identifying the special skills of staff members is helpful in providing quality activities.
This may be a place where differentiated assignments of counselors and other staff members could best serve the program and provide staff with the opportunity to use some special talent or training.
Materials and Space: Materials and Equipment: The materials that must be available to you and your staff as you change your program from reactive to proactive are as important as the human resources.
Consider beginning with a survey of guidance and other school equipment and materials that you may use in your program.
As a part of this survey, counselors and teachers are given the opportunity to include any equipment and materials that are currently available and any that are to be purchased.
Steps in Assessing Current Guidance Program Resources: 1.
Gather information about the present state of your current program using the perspective of the four guidance program components.
In this assessment, the resources include space, equipment, materials, use of community resource persons and agencies.
2. Use the four Guidance Components (Guidance Curriculum, Individual Planning, etc) to organize this review of resources.
For each Guidance Component, list objectives, the methods used to reach those objectives (curriculum activities, counseling strategies, etc.), and the resources needed to apply each method.
3.
Taking each of the resources listed above one by one, list on separate sheets of paper, in three columns: a) available now, b) are now in use, and c) need to procure.
4.
Develop a plan to organize those resources you have available and to procure those you do not have.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
49
Figure 6-1 Example of Steps in Assessing Current Guidance Program Resources Guidance Curriculum Objective 1.
Students will learn how to stay safe in school Methods a.
Classroom Curriculum Resources a. Counselor/teachers develop activities b. Police officer Have/Need a.
Need to examine existing curriculum and adapt or adopt b.
Have police liaison officer Bob Brown
b. Invited speaker
Facilities and Space: Your comprehensive guidance and counseling program will require an area that is appropriate for housing human and material resources.
You will need to assure that your center: 1.
Will house appropriate personnel, resources, and equipment 2.
Is easily accessible to all students including those with disabilities 3.
Is equipped with up-to-date equipment and materials 4.
Contains a soundproof, confidential area for counselors 5.
Includes a well organized and displayed collection of guidance resource materials and the equipment needed to use the materials.
Activity: Designing Program Facilities and Space On a piece of graph paper, (You may want to use newsprint sized graph paper.)
chart your current guidance and counseling resource center.
Indicate where small and large group meetings take place, where equipment and resources are located, and how access is gained.
On a second piece of graph paper, chart a proposed comprehensive guidance and counseling center, one that will meet the requirements of your new program.
Ask yourselves how these are different.
Brainstorm how you will move from your current center to your proposed center.
What is your first step? Guidance Program Budget: As your program is defined and takes its place with other established programs, (e.g. Mathematics, Language Arts, etc.) an adequate comprehensive guidance and counseling program budget needs to be established.
The budget will reflect all resource needs of your program if it is to achieve its place within the school program.
In order to make this happen, the guidance program budget needs to be separate and distinctive from the administrative budget and stand on its own merits.
Those expense items that are common to all sections of the school's program are included in the administrative budget.
Examples include staff development, professional subscriptions, computer hardware, etc.
Only items that are pertinent to the guidance program need to be included.
Working with your steering committee as you design your budget, reflect the resources needed to provide a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program to all of the students in your school.
By utilizing the four guidance components, you will be able to relate your budget items to the new program plan.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
50
Figure 6-2 Designing a Sample Program Budget Guidance Program Component Guidance Curriculum
Goal Developmental Guidance Classroom Activities/ Materials
Audience Students
Objective Purchase/develop Materials for Classroom Activities
Cost $600.00
Individual Planning
Responsive Services
System Support
Integrating Activities into the School and Guidance Programs Once you have completed your formal and informal needs assessments, you will be able to identify specific guidance objectives that need to be done in classrooms or small groups.
Step one: Clarify from your needs assessment which of the needs to address.
Your steering committee might decide to take one of the top three needs that have been identified and brainstorm how, when, and where to integrate this into the guidance and counseling program.
Using your best brainstorming techniques, your committee will arrive at a consensus before implementing your strategies.
Step two: Clarify which student needs will be addressed in which program components.
The way a particular need is addressed is up to the counseling staff in conjunction with the steering committee.
Step three: Find places within the total school program and in the guidance and counseling program where these needs may be addressed.
Many teachers and staff members not only find places where this need may easily be infused, they may already be doing it.
If they are, then counselors may serve as resources.
As an example, imagine that students, parents, teachers, and community members have identified several areas that, upon further analysis, appear to reflect a need for conflict resolution.
These identified needs: 1) Peer pressure, 2) Resolving conflicts and making compromises, 3) Help for transfer students, and 4) School adjustment, all indicate that many students are having difficulties getting along with others.
There are several excellent programs that have been developed to address the challenge of helping students get along with others.
A first step in tackling this challenge might be for one or several of your counseling staff to attend a staff development program that addresses one or more of the issues described and to return from this program with new strategies to address the needs.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
51
An Example of How Integration of Activities Takes Place: Guidance Curriculum: If the challenge, such as the one described above, is a school-wide or districtwide problem, then your steering committee will want to address the challenge in a comprehensive developmental manner that pervades your entire system.
Let's use "preventing bullying" as an example.
In this case, The Kindness Campaign, (Weinhold, 2000), is a good example of a developmental, whole school approach to the challenge.
Once your chosen resource has been identified, consider developing a matrix that reflects how and where the activities will be introduced.
To avoid repetition, indicate exactly what activity and method is being used at each level.
Individual Planning: Perhaps the bullying behavior is not generalized throughout the school, but appears to be concentrated in one grade or at one level.
As with any other need that appears to be more specific, you and your team will want to develop strategies that can be utilized either in a classroom, a small group, or perhaps even with an individual student.
Responsive Services: An example of using responsive services to deal with bullying may be if the student is in danger of harming him/herself or others.
Here is where the counseling, consulting, and referral skills of the counseling staff may involve the crisis management team.
System Support: Recently, through both local and national events, a concern about the safety of students in the schools has arisen.
Policies to address these issues may already be in place locally, through school, district, or statewide policies, or through national regulations, such as the No Child Left Behind Act.
This is an example of a system support approach to the challenge.
Sources of Useful Resources and Successful Practices Many school counselors are either using commercial programs or have developed excellent program activities.
A small random sample of New Hampshire school counselors related that they preferred to create their own tailored programs rather that to use "canned" programs.
Creating your own in each area takes time and resources, however, so it is useful to canvas what is available and perhaps build or adapt from that.
Increasingly, there are web sites that describe resources and curriculum materials.
For example, a quick search of Education World located Ten Web Sites for Exploring Conflict Resolution in the Classroom with links to approximately 600 separate and distinct publications.
In New Hampshire, the Keene Curriculum Materials Library at the Keene State College loans guidance and counseling materials on many subjects to any NH educator - conveniently, through the mail!
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
52
Figure 7-4 Steps in Developing a Guidance Curriculum 1.
From the list of need statements, generated out of the needs assessment, develop a priority list of learning objectives that will address the identified needs.
2.
Using the set of learning objectives, develop a set of corresponding outcomes.
Some objectives will have several outcomes.
3.
With the help of your steering committee, establish a priority list of outcomes for the present or the next school year.
Be certain that you inform the total school staff, parents, students and community of this list and how the priorities were selected.
Cross reference with state, district, and building goals.
4.
Engage the total school staff in publicizing these priorities as top priorities for all school staff and students.
If possible, create a "theme" for the school year, semester, or grading period.
Use common and age appropriate language.
5.
Link these priorities to the various program components.
Most learning objectives will require a multi-faceted approach, integrating many within school courses and extracurricular activities while also assigning them to multiple components of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
6.
Identify a preferred delivery system for each learning objective.
Most will be introduced in one instructional situation (example: classroom) but will be developed, reinforced and supported by other instructional situations (examples: individual planning session, or as part of a subject-matter course.)
7.
With the teaching staff who have already agreed to assist, determine appropriate instructional formats and strategies for each learning objective (figure 6-3); select and/or create curriculum units and activities to teach the specific learning objectives to classrooms, small groups, or individuals (figure 6-4).
8.
Develop a matrix that reflects how, when, and where the learning objectives will be introduced; and where they will be developed and reinforced (examples: elementary, middle, senior high or grades K ­ 3, 4 ­ 6, 7 ­ 9, 10 ­ 12.
9.
Similarly, identify the specific components of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program that will introduce, develop, and reinforce each of the guidance learning objectives.
You may want to develop a similar matrix.
10.
Develop a school year schedule for the assignment of learning objectives teaching and obtain the necessary commitments both from school staff members and for resources and time.
Create specific criteria that prove outcome success.
The following Example with its useful activities (using bully-proofing as the subject area) are included to give a visual reference of how Classroom Guidance and Counseling activities may be designed and implemented.
Your program may decide to use a format and style that works best for your school and population.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
53
Figure 6-3 Instructional Formats Appropriate for Guidance Activities
Didactic (focuses on transmittal of subject content) Lecture Readings, texts Tests, exams Written reports Papers, theses Discussion groups Demonstrations Question/answer Group projects
Experiential (focuses on learner activities) Simulation activities On-the-job training Field tryouts Internships Video of Group Culmination Activity
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
54
Figure 6-4 Suggested Outline for Curriculum Activity/Lesson Plan
Outcome Statement:
Grade Level: Task:
Materials:
Procedure:
Follow-up Activities:
Evaluation:
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
55
Lesson #1 Survey on Bullying Note: This is a sample lesson from a unit developed by school counselor Jan Wiley specifically for this model.
Outcome Statement: Both adults and students will become aware of the extent of bullying in their school by completing and receiving feedback on a survey about bullying.
Grade Level: All Task: Students and adults will complete an anonymous survey on bullying in their school.
Materials: Copies of the survey for each student.
Number 2 pencils.
Note: The following have excellent surveys ­ Maine Project Against Bullying ­ sauflers@lincoln.midcoast.com, The Bully-Free Classroom by Allan Beane, Dr. Rigby's website ­ profread@pipeline.com.au, or a simple survey can be created by the counselor asking pertinent questions about his/her school as long as questions about extent of the problem, frequency of intervention and knowledge of parents about their child's school experience are included.
Procedure: 1.
Tell students that you are seeking information to help deal with the problem of bullying in their school.
2.
Tell them that the survey is anonymous.
They are not to put their names on the survey.
All students should use the pencils supplied to complete the survey.
3.
Ask the students to read each question carefully, to think about each question before answering and to answer as honestly as they can.
4.
Provide a definition of bullying before students begin.
5.
When students have finished, collect the surveys, thank them for their participation and tell them that you will return next week (or as soon as the results are done) to discuss the results.
6.
You may wish to remind students of your referral procedure in case anyone wishes to discuss a current bullying situation confidentially.
Follow-up: It is crucial to disseminate the results of the survey as soon as possible.
Evaluation: Students can be evaluated on following classroom rules for participation.
Survey results can be evaluated by how useful the information is in formulating a plan.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
56
Lesson #2 Discussion About Bullying Outcome statement: Through discussion about the results of the survey taken in lesson one and in answer to the counselor's discussion questions, the students will learn information about bullying both in their school and in the world at large.
Grade level: All - with adjustment in language for grade level.
Note: Because high school students are more reluctant to discuss bullying in large groups, the counselor may choose to present responses to survey and use the discussion questions in smaller groups.
Task: Counselor will share results of survey completed in lesson #1.
Counselor will lead a discussion using questions which he/she thinks are pertinent to her/his school..
Materials: Copies of the results of the survey completed previously.
Procedure: 1.
Remind students of the survey completed in lesson #1.
2.
Tell them that you are there to share the results.
3.
Go over the results of the survey.
4.
Ask if students have any questions.
5.
Using your list of questions, lead a discussion that will tie together your school's data and the research on bullying.
6.
Ask each student what he/she learned during today's discussion.
Follow-up: Writing on the topic of bullying can be done through journals, in articles for school newsletters, or as general writing assignments.
Groups can be formed for discussion of interventions (though this might be better done after lessons #3 and #4).
Evaluation: Students can be evaluated on following class rules during the discussion.
Writing samples can be evaluated for knowledge of the topic.
Observation of ability to work together in the small group and large group discussion is also a valuable assessment point.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
57
Lesson # 3 Responding to Bullies Outcome statement: Through discussion and role-play students will learn several ways of responding to disrespectful treatment.
Grade level: K-6 Materials: The Bullying Quiz from Beane (1999).
Book to be read to class.
See resource list for titles of books for children and grade level.
Poster paper and markers for 4 or 5 groups.
Procedure: 1.
Optional - Administer the bullying quiz to set the stage.
2.
Read the book (which you have chosen from the resource list) aloud to a point where the bully in the story is threatening someone.
3.
Stop here and ask for ideas about how the target feels and how he/she can respond.
Brainstorm and list suggestions.
4.
Teach the concepts: " If Someone Treats you Disrespectfully, You Could...."
5.
Return to the story and ask volunteers to role-play the target using one or more of the ideas learned in #3.
(It is better for the counselor/teacher to take the bullying role.)
6.
Complete the story to see how it is resolved.
Follow-up activities: Students could write their own stories using what they have learned and share them with younger students.
Posters can be created and posted throughout the school reminding students of the choices they have in responding to bullying.
Evaluation: Students can be evaluated on the following of classroom rules during the presentation and o the student's ability to work together as a team.
Evaluate the difference in student responses in #3 and # 5 in the procedure.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
58
Lesson # 4 Bystanders Barry K. Weinhold (2000) tells that when Tom Brown (1999) interviewed students for his Broken Toy Project, he asked students what three things kids do when they see someone being bullied.
This is what they answered: Run over and watch, run over and watch and run over and watch.
Herein lies an important piece of the problem.
The majority of our students are not bullies, are frustrated about bullying, say they want to help, but lack the skills to intervene.
These students can significantly reduce bullying by the ways in which they react to it.
We need to teach those skills to our students if bullying is to be reduced.
Some of the skills include refusing to watch bullying, reporting bullying incidents, and/or using distraction with either the bully or victim.
One of the few resources to address this important aspect is the work out of Wellesley College (Quit It!, BullyProof, and Flirting or Hurting) The following lesson plan adapts some of the ideas found in those curricula.
Outcome: Students will learn skills to take appropriate action when they witness incidents of bullying or harassment.
Grade Level: K-6 with teachers adapting language for grade level.
Note: Since research shows that high school students do not participate as readily in large group discussions about bullying, but since it is important to address this issue at that level, counselors are referred to Flirting or Hurting? (Stein,1994) for age appropriate approaches.
Task: The students will complete the "Courage by Degrees" intervention adding their own where applicable.
handout and discuss the steps of
Materials: A copy of "Courage by Degrees" for each student.
Video on bullying.
Procedure: 1.
Start the lesson by showing clips from a video or filmstrip or reading from one of the books for children mentioned in the resource list.
(Optional) 2.
Introduce the concept of the bystander using data gleaned from your research review.
3.
Ask the students what they would do as a bystander.
(Often, students say they would help, but in reality, very few do.
They are unsure about how to help.)
4.
Have students complete "Courage by Degrees" from Sjostrom and Stein (1996), or use a selfreflection tool that you have created.
5.
Divide students into groups and have them brainstorm ways that bystanders can help.
6.
Pull the group back together and share ideas.
You may wish to fill in ideas not mentioned by students.
7.
Ask students to name one thing they would do the next time they witness bullying.
Follow-up: Conflict resolution lessons in befriending, assertiveness and leadership would be helpful to all children, but especially to those children who will take on this helping role.
Bystanders who take action must be supported by the adults in the school (Cowie, 1998).
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
59
If Someone Treats You Disrespectfully, You Could......
1.
Talk to A. B. C.
them.
Stand up straight.
Say to myself, "I don't deserve this!" Say to the bully: Stop bothering me.
Don't do that.
I'll report you if you don't stop.
I'm not interested in a fight.
Just because you say it is, doesn't make it so.
(And then walk away.)
D. Ask them why they are treating you that way.
E. Remind them of the class'/school's/community's agreements.
F. Ask if you can find a way to be civil with each other.
2.
Walk away and: A. Report what happened to someone you trust.
B. Remind yourself that everyone deserves to be treated with respect.
C. Take a "golden moment".
Breathe deeply and slowly and imagine yourself in a nice place doing something you like to do.
D. Do something you like to do (alone or with a friend).
E. Share your feelings with someone safe.
F. Ask someone (teacher, parent, other adult, or friend) to help you figure out what to do.
G. Write a letter to the bully and tell him/her how you feel about what's going on and what you want done about it.
H. Get involved in some activities that help you feel good.
I. Take karate lessons.
ESR-NH ­ as compiled from a number of sources: Bullying at School: What We Know and What We Can Do, by Dan Olweus, Bullies 
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
60
Courage by Degrees For each of the following examples, rate the degree of courage needed to intervene, on a scale of 1-4 where "1" means the least amount of courage and "4" indicates the most.
Give your reason for the degree of courage you feel is required for each.
"How much courage does it take to..."
1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
9.
10.
11.
12.
13.
14.
15.
16.
17.
18.
19.
Tell one of your friends to stop teasing a kid you don't know very well? Tell one of the popular kids to stop making fun of someone you don't know very well? Tell a bully to stop picking on a kid you don't like? Stick up for you best friend? Step in if a kid who doesn't like you is targeted by a bully? Tell a bully to stop teasing a kid who has bullied you in the past? Tell a bully to stop picking on someone who doesn't have many friends? Tell someone to stop bullying if you are very popular? Include a new girl or boy in a game? Confront a group of bullies who are pushing a kid around? Confront a bully who is your age and teasing a younger kid? Tell your parents or a relative about someone who is bullying you? Tell your teacher about someone who is bullying another student? Tell an older kid to stop saying mean things to someone your age? Ignore someone who teases you while you are playing? Run away from a bully? Run away if you are outnumbered by a group of bullies? Say something to a girl who is picking on a boy? Say something to a boy who is picking on a girl?
Adapted with permission, from Bullyproof: A Teacher's Guide on Teasing and Bullying by Lisa Sjostom and Nan Stein; published by Wellesley College Center for Research on Women and the NEA Professional Library: 1996.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
61
What A Bystander (Witness) Can Do
Courage Level One: Withhold support from the bully and do not participate in the hurtful act.
Do not encourage a bully with laughter and /or words.
Choose not to repeat gossip or spread malicious rumors.
(Takes the power away from the person gossiping.)
Refuse to pass nasty notes.
Rip them up and throw them away.
Courage Level Two: Privately let the target know you feel bad and offer kindness and friendship.
Let an adult know that a bullying situation has occurred.
Distract the bully.
Privately appeal to the bully's sensitive side and make him/her aware of how much he/she is hurting the target.
Courage Level Three: Stand up for the target in the presence of the bully.
Invite the target to join your group in the presence of the bully.
A confident student with plenty of self-esteem can confront a bully directly: "Stop that!" "That is not nice."
Join with other witnesses by: Asserting school rules/standards Walking someone home who feels vulnerable Forming a human barrier in dangerous situations for the target (lunch, recess, etc.)
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
62
Resources ­ Topic of Bullying Articles: Banks, Ron.
(1997).
Bullying in schools, Eric Digest ­ EDO-PS-97-17, 1-5.
Brown, T. (1999, January 18).
The bullying reference, 1(4), Zanesville, OH: The Broken Toy Project.
Retrieved February 6, 1900 from World Wide Web: http://members.tripod.com-Ghoul2xBully1.html Cowie, H.(1998).
From bystanding to standing by ­ The role of peer support against school bullying.
Presented at the Europeon Conference on Initiatives to Combat school Bullying.
London: 1998.
Foltz-Gray, D.(1996).
The bully trap, Teaching Tolerance, Fall, p.19.
Whitney, I. and Smith, P.K. (1993).
A survey of the nature and extent of bullying in junior/middle and secondary schools.
Educational Research, 35(l), 3-25.
Weinhold, Barry K.(2000).
Uncovering the hidden causes of bullying and school violence, Counseling and Human Development, 32 (6), 1-18.
Books: Beane, Allan.
(1999).
The bully free classroom: Over l00 tips and strategies for teachers K-8.
Minneapolis, MN: FreeSpirit Publishing Co. Inc.
Fried, S., 
Bullies and Victims: Helping Your Child through the Schoolyard Battlefield.
New York: M. Evans 
(1989).
Set straight on bullies.
Malibu, CA: Pepperdine University Press.
Note: On pp. 78-82 is a questionnaire for students regarding bullying in their school.
Johnson, D. W., 
Teaching children to be peacemakers.
Edina, MN: Interaction Book Co.
Kriedler, William.
(l984).
Creative conflictrResolution.
Glenview, IL: Scott Foresman 
Kriedler, William.
(1994).
Conflict resolution in the middle school.
Cambridge, MA: Educators for Social Responsibility.
Lantieri, Linda 
(1996).
Waging peace in our schools.
Boston, MA: Beacon Press.
Maines, B. and Robinson, G. (1992).
The no blame approach.
Bristol: Lame Duck Publishing.
McNamara, B. 
Keys to dealing with bullies.
Hauppauge, NY: Barron's.
Noll, Kathy 
(1997).
Taking the bully by the horns.
PA: Unicorn Press.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
63
Olweus, Dan (1993) Bullying at school: What we know and what we can do.
Cambridge, MA: Blackwell.
Longitudinal research on bullying and intervention.
A seminal work in the field.
Paley, V. (1992).
You can't say you can't play.
Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press.
Rigby, K. (1996).
Bullying in schools ­ And what to do about it.
Toronto: Pembroke Publishers.
Romain, Trevor.
(1997).
Bullies are a pain in the brain.
Minneapolis, MN, Free Spirit Publishing Inc.
Written for kids with cartoon illustrations.
Ross, Dorothea.
(1996).
Childhood bullying and teasing: What school personnel, other professionals and parents can do.
Available from American Counseling Association, P.O. Box 531, Annapolis Junction, MD 20701-0531; phone 800-422-2648; 259p.
Stein, N. 
Flirting or hurting? A teacher's guide on student-to student sexual harassment in schools.
Washington DC: NEA.
Weinhold, B. (1996).
Spreading kindness: A program guide for reducing youth violence in the schools.
Colorado Springs, CO: Kindness Campaign.
Books ­ Children's: Herbie's Troubles by Carol Chapman (Dutton, 1981); grades K-3.
Chrysanthemum by Kevin Henkes (Greenwillow, 1991); grades K-3.
King of the Playground by Phyllis Reynolds Naylor (Macmillan, 1994); grades K-2.
Oliver Button is a Sissy by Tomie de Paolo (Harcourt Brace, 1979); grades 1-3.
Joshua T. Bates Takes Charge by Susan Shreve (Knopf, 1993); grades 2-4.
The Hundred Dresses by Eleanor Estes (Harcourt-Brace, 1994); grades 2-5.
The Eighteenth Emergency by Betsy Byars (Viking, 1973); grades 3-6.
Wendy and the Bullies by Nancy Robinson (Scholastic, 1980); grades 3-6.
The Bully of Barkham Street by Mary Stolz (Harper Collins, 1985); grades 4-6.
Stick Boy by Joan T. Zeier (Macmillan, 1993); grades 5-6.
Catalogs: Free Spirit Publishing Inc. 400 First Avenue North, Suite 616 Minneapolis, MN 55401-1724 www.freespirit.com New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
64
Curricula: Bodine, Richard L., Crawford, D., Schrumpf, F. (1994).
Creating the peaceable school: A comprehensive program for teaching conflict resolution.
Champagne, IL: Research Press.
Committee for Children, (l997).
Second step: A violence prevention curriculum.
Seattle, WA.
This is a Pre-K through 8th grade packaged, researched-based curriculum focusing on building social skills in empathy, impulse control and anger management.
Froschl, Sprung 
(1998).
Quit it! : A teacher's guide on teasing and bullying for use with students in grades K-3.
New York: Educational Equity Concepts, Inc.
Garity, Carla; Jens, Kathryn; Porter, William; Sager, Nancy, Short-Cahill, Cam. (1994) Bully-proofing your school: A comprehensive approach for elementary schools.
Available from Sopris West, 1140 Boston Avenue, Longmont, Co, 80501; phone: 800-547-6747.
ED383956; 367p.
Jenson, W., et.al. (1994).
The tough kid toolbox.
Available from Sopris West, 1140 Boston Avenue, Longmont, CO, 80501; phone: 800-547-6747; 120 pp. Mattise, Chris.
(1999).
The HELPFUL-HURTFUL Policy for Addressing Harassment in the Elementary School.
Available from M.C. Mattise, Hurt-free Schools; phone: 888-258-6830; web: http://www.hurtfree-character.com; 60p.
Rhode, G., et.al. (1992).
The tough kid book: Practical classroom management strategies.
Available from Sophris West, 1140 Boston Ave., Longmont, CO, 80501; phone: 800-5476747; 120p.
Sjostrom, L, 
BullyProof: A teacher's guide on teasing and bullying for use with fourth and fifth grade students.
Boston, MA: Wellesley College Center for Research on Women and the NEA Professional Library.
Webster-Doyle, Terrence; Russ, Adryan.
(1994).
Why is Everybody Always Picking On Me: A Special Curriculum for Young People to Help Them Cope with Bullying.
Available from Atrium Society Publications, P.O. Box 816, Middlebury, VT 05753: phone: 800-848-6021; 181p.
Organizations: The Center for Study and Prevention of Violence University of Colorado at Boulder Campus Box 439 Boulder, CO 80309-0439 Fax: 303/443-3297 Educators for Social Responsibility 23 Garden Street Cambridge, MA 01238 http://www.benjerry.com/esr/about-esr.html
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
65
Eric Clearinghouse on Elementary and Early Childhood Education University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign Children's Research Center 51 Gerty Drive Champaign, IL 61820-7469 http://www.ericeece.org National Association for the Education of Young Children 1509 16th Street NW Washington, DC, 20036-1426 http://naeyc.org National School Safety Center 4165 Thousand Pals Blvd., Suite 290 Westlake Village, CA, 91362 www.nssc1.org Video: Institutes for Families in Society (University of South Carolina) and South Carolina Educational Television.
"Bullying".
Video, 11 minutes.
Also A teacher's guide to accompany the video "Bullying".
Both available from South Carolina ETV, Marketing Department, P.O. Box 11000, Columbia, SC 29211, phone: 800-553-7752.
Web sites: www.safechild.org/bullies.html www.bullybeware.com/tips.html www.kidscape.org.uk/kidscape/bullied.htm www.childline.org.uk/bullying.htm www.nobully.org.nz chuck_saufleur@wiscasset.k12.me.us - Maine Project Against Bullying http://www.solnet.co.uk/kidscape/kids4.htm - Kidscape http://www.pto.org/programs ­ National Organizations of Parent Teacher Assoc. http://www.ncpc.org ­ National Crime Prevention Council http://www.uccs.edu/~kindness
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
66
Chapter 7: Implementing and Promoting Your Program Now that your new program is going into place, here are some strategies to raise public awareness of your progress.
Public Service Announcements: If a media person has been included on the steering committee, this work may have already begun.
Use radio, television, or newspaper sound bites or public service announcements to detail what is happening this week with your program.
If you do not have a media person directly involved, you may need to designate a member of your committee to fulfill this role.
Speaking Engagements: The first group that you will be presenting to is your school board.
Once you have their go-ahead, you are ready to present to other groups; for example, the Parent Teachers' Organization, the Chamber of Commerce, and/or the many service groups.
The committee should consider where and how will you let the students know about your new program.
Professional Service: Many of the members of your steering committee are members of professional groups.
They may be Boy/Girl/Explorer Scout leaders, members of boards of directors, or leaders in a community service organization.
They not only model the behavior of a steering committee member, they serve as advocates for your program.
Professionalism: As you really begin to implement your comprehensive school guidance and counseling program, you may decide to present your work to your state counseling organization.
The New Hampshire School Counselor Association holds yearly conferences and entertains proposals for program presentations.
This is a great way to describe your progress and to receive feedback and share recommendations from other schools, and at the same time inspire others with your progress!.
Student Activities and Events: You are probably enjoying some of these activities: Career Days, Job Shadowing, Poetry and Poster Contests for School Counselor Month or Career Development Month.
What else are you doing in your school that promotes your emerging program? Meetings with Parents: Many schools have program meet with, for example, eighth grade parents about consider alternative times so that you will meet with things to consider? Child care? The dinner schedule? planning evenings during which the staff members the process of course selections.
As you do this, potentially all of the parents.
What are some other Transportation? Who can help you with this?
A Web Presence: School districts today provide on-line communication within and outside of their schools, using the World-Wide-Web.
Ask your web-master to help you set up a website.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
67
Newsletters and Journals: Not only is your school newsletter looking for items of interest, but the New Hampshire School Counselor Association Newsletter welcomes stories that describe the work that you are accomplishing.
Consider submitting articles of interest to regional and national publications as well.
Professionals appreciate stories by and about other professionals.
Policy Briefs: As your Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Program changes and meets your expectations, consider developing one-page policy briefs that describe these changes and your continuing success.
Advocating for Your Program: Because you have been inclusive of your consumers and providers (your steering committee) during the planning and development phases of your program, you have put into place an advocacy group.
Although you and your staff are constantly promoting that which you are accomplishing, a number of other school and community personnel are advocating for, and with, you.
This is one good reason for keeping everyone involved and informed every step of the way.
At the same time that you are counting upon your steering committee to work with you in advocating for your program, you are also modeling positive behavior in every possible situation.
Teachers know their students well because they see them every day.
Teachers are often in touch with parents/guardians about challenges that are facing the students, and can become your best advocate when suggesting that the student join a small guidance group or participate in a classroom activity that addresses those challenges.
By putting a positive spin on the situation, you may be seen as advocating for the teacher at the same time that you are advocating for the students Communicating With Parents/Guardians: Next to the students, the single most important population with whom you work is the parents or guardians.
Some schools provide a yearly spaghetti dinner or pot-luck supper for families and use this as an opportunity to acquaint parents and guardians with the school counselors and the school guidance and counseling program.
One school district sends a guidance letter home with the quarterly grade report, simply keeping parents or guardians informed about what is going on that pertains to their student.
This letter is mailed with the grade report, and is addressed to the parent or guardian.
Using a Time Line: Once your steering committee has decided upon the tasks that need to be accomplished in order to move from a reactive, service-oriented delivery to a proactive, program oriented delivery, they will need to decide the period of time this project will take.
We suggest that you plan on two to three years for a complete change.
If your plan is in place and well communicated to all involved, it may just move right along.
If there are changes in staff, committee members, or other important entities, you may need to revisit certain parts of your planning.
Figure 7 -1 is a suggested sequence.
You may choose to use this to determine your time frame.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
68
Figure 7 -1 Steering Committee Tasks for Involvement in the Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Program/Development Phase Select advisory committee members; assign work groups for conducting time and task analysis; write mission statement coordinate needs assessment; etc.
Date: (From ­ to) Conduct time and analysis Involve all administrators Involve all teachers Create needs assessment instruments and conduct needs assessment
Dates
Dates:
Dates:
Dates:
Analyze and plan for use of needs assessment; publicize results; plan objectives Dates:
Develop curriculum based upon program objectives
Eliminate non-guidance functions
Begin to establish Master Calendar
Make the transition
Dates:
Dates:
Dates:
Dates:
Systematic Training Over Time Periodically, your steering committee will need to take stock of its direction, and perhaps even consider some mid-course corrections.
Throughout the process, you need to consider building in training and development time to accomplish this.
You may find that you will send members of your committee to a state or regional conference to gain some expertise to bring back to your committee.
Other times, you may want to bring in a professional to train the entire committee.
Often, the expertise is readily available to you; it may rest with your state department guidance and counseling office, state counseling association leadership personnel, or with someone who has been through the change process.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
69
Chapter 8: Evaluating Your Program There are many aspects to the evaluation of your Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Program.
These aspects can be divided into several manageable parts, each of which can be developed and implemented as a unit within its own time frame and program area.
Three major areas of evaluation and some of the questions that need to be addressed pertain to staff performance, comprehensive guidance program, and guidance curriculum.
The examples included in this chapter are only examples, meant to be adapted or serve as guides so that each program may develop its own evaluation processes and procedures.
Developing Job Descriptions/Facilitating School Counselor Evaluation Each position within the comprehensive program deserves its own job description, and as the program changes, you will need to rewrite job descriptions to make certain that they fit with new responsibilities.
Many schools use the same tool to evaluate both teachers and the school counseling staff.
Sometimes this is done because of contract issues that are common to all staff, and it is important to collect the relevant information about the current evaluation practices in your school, and follow the correct procedures if you would like to make change.
As an example of an evaluation tool specific to school counselors, we have included, with permission, the School Counselor Appraisal adapted from an instrument developed by Kathryn VanZandt, Director of Guidance Programs, Windham High School, Windham, Maine, (Figure 8-1).
A Word about Supervision The supervision of school counselors is composed of three parts.
First, counselors administrative supervision.
The building principal does administrative supervision.
This supervision looks at school counselors' administrative performance.
For instance, counselors arrive on time to work, they need to return phone calls, they need to turn their reports in on administrative supervision, counselors are supervised like other school employees.
receive type of need to time.
In
The second type of supervision is program supervision.
This type of supervision looks at how well the counselor is implementing the comprehensive program elements.
In larger districts a guidance director does this evaluation; in smaller systems, administrators or lead counselors do this type of evaluation.
The third type of supervision is counseling supervision.
Professional school counselors provide essential services, both direct and indirect, to students.
Among these services, school counselors provide counseling to students.
While school counselors do not provide in-depth therapy to students, they do provide supportive and educational counseling and guidance This is the one area where school counselors need specialized supervision, provided by someone with the knowledge and training of a counselor.
Research suggests that unless counselors receive supervision on their counseling skills, their New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
70
skills stagnate and decline.
Yet few school counselors are provided consistent counseling supervision.
Recent research suggests that, more often than not, school administrators will support the provision of counseling supervision if counselors present a strong case for it.
Counseling supervision can take several forms.
Probably most common is the practice of counselors within the same district meeting regularly to discuss the counseling they provide.
This peer supervision reduces isolation, strengthens skills, and can increase the ethical practice of counseling in schools.
Other times, counselors in a district will receive counseling supervision from school psychologists, community mental health counselors or university counselor educators who contract with the school or district.
Regardless of the form counseling supervision takes, its provision is essential to professional implementation of a comprehensive school counseling program.
Student Outcome Evaluation Measurement of student outcomes reveals the effectiveness of your comprehensive school guidance and counseling program in meeting the assessed needs of the student population.
If desired student outcomes have already been determined through the needs assessment, it will be an easy task to develop outcome statements for this type of evaluation.
Figure 8-2 is a sample student outcome assessment that can serve as a guide.
Administering the outcome evaluation to those students who have been selected to learn the specific skill or knowledge in a pre-test/post-test situation (in September and again in May) will yield data to show the degree to which the students believe they have learned the skill.
This approach provides subjective responses from students about areas in which growth has occurred.
Additional information about individual students can be obtained from parents or teachers, if desired, by using a parallel instrument and asking parents or teachers to rate their students.
After gathering the data, compare the results of the three groups to determine which knowledge or skill areas need more attention.
A relatively quick method for assessing student progress is a rubric, a chart that can show individual or accumulative data.
Figure 8-3 is an example of an assessment rubric for this purpose.
Evaluating the Results of Your Curriculum When a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program curriculum presentation, in either a classroom or a group presentation, is completed by a counselor and/or teacher, a very brief presenter(s) evaluation needs to be administered.
Each student should anonymously complete a form similar to figure 8-4 and drop it in a box or envelope before leaving the session.
Figure 8-5 has been designed to serve as a feed-back instrument for 1) classroom activities presented by a counselor and/or teacher 2) groups (one time only meeting or discussion, or ongoing groups), and 3) special workshops or programs (such as class or individual activity, job-shadowing a person in business or industry, visits to a college, etc.).
Care needs to be taken to actually use the results of these evaluations to further the goals of the program and to enhance the good work already being done.
Reviewing the evaluations provides information about trends.
The emerging information can be useful in determining mid-course corrections as the program is developed.
Furthermore, program evaluation categories and program activity review results can be compared within the same year as well as from one year to another over a period of years.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
71
Instruments for Program Review A good program evaluation is a process rather than an event that occurs only once or twice.
The primary purpose of evaluation is the improvement of the school guidance and counseling program.
One way to gather ongoing evaluation and feedback from those who use the school guidance and counseling program is to provide an easy way for them to comment after contact with the program.
This gives a welcoming, open atmosphere to the program, demonstrating in concrete terms that the program is designed to meet the needs of the whole school community for the benefit of students.
Figures 8-6 and 8-7 represent sample forms that have been developed to further this process of on-going evaluation and feedback.
The Individual Session Form (Figure 8-6) provides process information for those who would like a method for collecting information about the results from the student's, parent's, or staff person's viewpoint on individual planning sessions or consultation sessions.
This form is intended primarily to give feedback to the individual school counselor on the effectiveness of individual meetings either with students or in the role of consultant with adults.
Some school counseling offices leave these feedback forms outside each office where they are easily noticeable and accessible, along with a closed container where they can be discretely deposited after being filled out.
Not only does this afford continuous feedback, but gives the strong message that feedback is welcomed and responded to by the entire school guidance and counseling program.
It is also important to evaluate your program as a whole.
After carefully building the structure of your comprehensive program and developing the schedule, scope, and sequence of activities that will fulfill the mission of your program, it makes sense to periodically find out how its working.
Periodic evaluation of the program itself allows for data-driven decision making and gives everyone in your school community the opportunity to share feedback about the needs and benefits of the school guidance and counseling program.
Information gleaned from program evaluation can be used by administrators to request budget support to implement the program, and allows for clear communication about all that is accomplished through your efforts.
An example of a Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling Program Evaluation that may be adapted to fit your program and school is included in figure 8-7.
The program evaluation form may be completed by staff members, either individually or as a group.
By totaling each category and converting to percentages, you will arrive at a quick indication of which categories require additional review and development or reinforcement.
Each school is encouraged to set a level of acceptable performance as indicated by a specific percentage for each of the seven major categories identified on the program evaluation form.
For program planning purposes, each school should establish its own ranking order of the seven categories, according to local philosophy and conditions.
This ranking will help to determine the best use of limited resources.
Comparing the evaluation forms completed by teachers with those completed by counseling staff and administrators can provide rich discussion about future program/staff development and refinement.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
72
Figure 8-1
School Counselor Performance Appraisal Instructions: 1.
The evaluator is to rate the counseling staff member on a four-point scale as indicated below.
2.
The evaluator is encouraged to add pertinent comments at the end of each major function.
3.
The counseling staff member is provided an opportunity to react to the evaluator's rating and comments.
4.
The evaluator and the counseling staff member discuss the results of the appraisal and any recommended action pertinent to it.
5.
Both the evaluator and the counseling staff member sign the instrument in the assigned spaces.
School Counseling Staff Member's Name: ___________________________________________ School: _______________________________________________________________________ Scale: 0 1 2 3 4 Not applicable Performs unsatisfactorily Needs improvement Meets performance expectations Exceeds performance expectations
A. Major Function: Manages the School Guidance and Counseling Program 1.
Assists in developing a comprehensive developmental school guidance and counseling plan that is based on student needs.
2.
Develops activities, resources and time lines to implement the goals and objectives of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program plan.
3.
Involves school personnel in the decision-making process related to implementing a comprehensive guidance and counseling program.
4.
Conducts regular public awareness initiatives to highlight guidance and counseling program activities, services, and accomplishments.
01234 01234 01234 01234
Comments: ____________________________________________________________________ B. Major Function: Provides Individual Planning 1.
Provides individual short-term counseling for students to meet their remedial, preventative, and developmental needs.
2.
Demonstrates positive human relationships by showing respect for the worth and dignity of all students from all cultural backgrounds.
3.
Shares appropriate information with school personnel, parents, and 01234 01234
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
73
community agencies about the needs and concerns of students.
4.
Networks with community agencies as needed.
01234 01234
Comments: ____________________________________________________________________ C. Major Function: Provides Group Counseling and Guidance 1.
Provides remedial, 2.
Assesses guidance short term group counseling for students to meet their preventive, and developmental needs.
the progress of students in group counseling and/or and evaluates the overall effectiveness of the interventions.
01234 01234
Comments: ____________________________________________________________________ D. Major Function: Provides Classroom Guidance 1.
Collaborates with classroom teachers to provide a classroom developmental guidance curriculum in the areas of career, educational, and individual/social development.
2.
Provides classroom guidance lessons that are developmentally appropriate.
3.
Uses teaching and classroom management strategies that are conducive to learning.
4.
Assesses the effectiveness of the classroom guidance curriculum.
01234 01234 01234 01234
Comments: ____________________________________________________________________ E: Major Function: Assists in Providing for Student's Career Development 1.
Provides an up-to-date career and vocational information system and resource center appropriate to age of the students.
2.
Assists students in achieving successful educational and vocational placement based upon aptitude, achievement, and interest.
3.
Provides parents with information and programs that help meet the career needs of students.
4.
Assists in the coordination of life/career portfolios that help the students integrate their career and life experiences.
5.
Assists in coordinating efforts of business, industry, and civic organizations to provide career opportunities for students.
01234 01234 01234 01234 0 12 3 4
Comments: ____________________________________________________________________ Major Function: Provides Consultation Services 1.
Describes the nature of consultation services to faculty and parents.
2.
Helps teachers and parents meet the specialized needs of students through mutual problem solving techniques.
01234 01234
Comments: ____________________________________________________________________
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
74
Major Function: Assists in Gathering and Utilizing Student Assessment Information 1.
Assists in implementing assessment programs and student evaluation procedures.
2.
Assists school personnel, parents and students in evaluating, interpreting, and utilizing test scores and other student data in order to meet student needs.
01234 01234
Comments: ____________________________________________________________________ Major Function: Keeps Own Professional Competence Current 1.
Updates professional growth and development plan 2.
Engages in professional development opportunities.
3.
Operates according to the ethical code of the counseling profession.
01234 01234 01234
Comments: ____________________________________________________________________ Evaluator's Summary Comments: __________________________________________________
School Counseling Staff Member's Reactions to Evaluations: ____________________________
_________________________________ Evaluator's Signature/Title _________________________________ School Counseling Staff Member's Signature
____________________________________ Date ____________________________________ Date
Signature indicates that the written evaluation has been seen and discussed.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
75
Figure 8-2 Student Outcome Evaluation Example: Taking one student outcome that has been identified through your needs assessment, Resolving Conflicts and Making Compromises, a series of questions for student response and a possible format for the instrument might look like: Directions: For each statement below, check the column heading that best describes how much you can do what the statement says.
I Cannot I Can To A I Can To A I Can To A Very Do It Small Degree Greater Degree Great Degree 1.
I can describe what I need to someone else.
2.
I can describe the things about myself I want to change.
3.
I can explain what I need to do to get along with others.
4.
I can work with other students on a project.
5.
I can help other students who need to learn about certain school subjects.
Figure 8-3 Using an Assessment Rubric to Evaluate Student Outcomes
Competency
1: Incomplete
2: Minimal Proficiency
3: Basic Proficiency
4: Strong Proficiency
I know how to stop someone from teasing me.
Cannot specify a Identifies a specific method.
method that Describes in very could be used.
general terms.
Identifies and uses one method and stops the teasing temporarily.
Identifies and uses a range of methods and stops the teasing permanently.
The Format for this chart was adapted from a similar chart developed by student Professional Services, Omaha Public School, Omaha, Nebraska and appeared in Handouts for Gysbers presentation to the New Hampshire School Counselor Association Annual Fall meeting, October 1999.
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
76
Figure 8-4
Presentation/Workshop Evaluation Presenter(s): _____________________________________________________________ Name of Lesson: __________________________________Date: ___________________
1.
What did you learn from this presentation?
2.
What did you like best about this presentation?
3.
What would you have like to be different about this presentation?
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
77
Figure 8-5 Activity Feedback Form This box to be filled out by your teacher or counselor ___________________________________ Component ____________ Group size
___________________________________ Activity Title ____________ Individual Leader's Name ____________________________ Your Grade Level ________Gender_______ 1.
The things I liked best about the activity were: Check all that apply.
_____ _____ _____ _____ _____ _____ I enjoyed taking part in this activity The leader explained the purpose of the activity.
The leader explained things clearly.
The leader listened to my questions and concerns.
There was enough time for discussion.
I found the information helpful.
_____Yes _____ No
I learned some ways to increase my abilities in this area
Comments: (please explain) _______________________________________________________ ______________________________________________________________________________ My goal for this activity was ___________________________________________________ I reached this goal.
_____ Yes _____ No
I would like to learn more about ________________________________________________ 5.
I would recommend this activity to another student.
6.
I would rate this activity as: _____Very helpful _____ Yes _____ No _____ Of Little Value
_____ Helpful
7.
I learned the following information about myself.
_______________________________ ______________________________________________________________________________ 8.
With this information I will now take responsibility to ________________________________ ______________________________________________________________________________
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
78
Figure 8-6
Individual Session Feedback Form
1.
My meeting was with ______________________________________________________ 2.
My purpose in coming to the meeting was______________________________________ __________________________________________________________________________ __________________________________________________________________________ 3.
I found the meeting to be
_____Very Helpful _____ Helpful
_____ Somewhat Helpful _____ Of Little Value _____ Yes _____ No
4.
I learned something that will help me in the future.
Comments: (optional) ________________________________________________________ __________________________________________________________________________
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
79
Figure 8-7 NH Comprehensive School Guidance 
The Program maintains a schedule of comprehensive school guidance and counseling activities.
B.
The Program establishes goals for the year, develops plans to work on goals, and assesses progress at the end of the year.
C.
The Program validates the use of school guidance and counseling activities through intermittent feedback from students, teachers, and parents.
D.
The Program's workload centers around a Master Calendar of guidance activities that is built with a high degree of involvement of administrators and teachers.
E.
Other Operating Sufficiently Well Exceptionally Well Done
________
________
________
________
________
________
________
________
________
________ ________
________ ________
________ _______
F.
Other Total Number of Check Marks Expressed in % Suggestions to improve this area
________ ______%
________ ______% Timeline:
________ ______%
______________________________________________ ______________________________________________
____________________ ____________________
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
80
Needs Attention or Improvement Area and Criteria II.
Guidance Curriculum A.
The Program spends the predetermined amount of time on the curriculum component.
B.
The Program maintains a schedule of classroom presentations/ activities.
C.
The Program has outlines of structured group experiences used in classroom activities with the theme and purpose identified.
D.
The Program seeks ways to develop or incorporate career and individual/social curricula within the school curriculum.
E.
The Program provides curriculum activities to all students.
F.
The Program conducts activities outside the classroom to respond to students' identified interests and needs.
G.
Other H.
Other Total Number of Check Marks Expressed in % Suggestions to improve this area ______________________________________________ ______________________________________________
Operating Sufficiently Well
Exceptionally Well Done
________ ________
________ ________
________ ________
________
________
________
________ ________
________ ________
________ ________
________ ________ ________
________ ________ ________
________ ________ ________
______%
______% Timeline:
______%
____________________ ____________________ 81
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
Needs Attention or Improvement Area and Criteria III.
Individual Planning A.
The Program spends the predetermined amount of time on the individual planning component.
________ B.
The Program provides individual planning to all students.
________ C.
In individual planning, the counselor reinforces the knowledge and skills that students have achieved in group and classroom involvement.
________ D.
The Program assists each student in learning and using the decision-making process as a part of long range planning and the making of choices on a daily basis.
________ E.
The Program assists students to assess and interpret their abilities, Interests, skills, and achievements.
________ F.
The Program assists students to select coursework and other in-school and out-ofschool activities that lead to realization of their future plans.
________ G.
The Program assists students in their decisionmaking that accompanies transitions; from one educational program to another, from one school to another, and/or from school to work.
________ H.
The Program assists students in securing information to explore career and life role possibilities, to plan career, educational, and individual/social goals, and to revise such plans ________ as fits their current stages of development.
I.
Other Total Number of Check Marks Expressed in % Suggestions to improve this area ______________________________________________ ______________________________________________ ________ ______%
Operating Sufficiently Well
Exceptionally Well Done
________ ________ ________
________ ________ ________
________ ________
________ ________
________
________
________
________
________ ________ ______% Timeline:
________ ________ ______%
____________________ ____________________
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
82
Needs Attention or Improvement Area and Criteria IV.
Responsive Services A.
The Program spends the predetermined amount of time on Responsive Services
Operating Sufficiently Well
Exceptionally Well Done
________
________ ________
________ ________
B.
The Program maintains a schedule of individual and group counseling appointments.
________ C.
The Program has established and disseminated to teachers and parents specific procedures for identification and referral of students for counseling.
________ D.
The Program maintains a current list of referral sources.
E.
The Program ensures a follow-up on each student referred.
F.
The Program plans for a realistic rearranging of counselor schedules to deal with any crisiscounseling that may be needed.
________ ________
________ ________ ________
________ ________ ________
________
________
________
G.
The Program develops methods for consulting with teachers with a minimum of interruption in work schedules.
________ H.
The Program has a way of identifying and providing counseling to students whose behavior demonstrates a need for career counseling, or making realistic career plans.
I.
The Program has a way of identifying and providing counseling to students who demonstrate a need for it through: excessive conflicts with family, authorities, friends, failing grades, poor school or classroom adjustment.
________
________
________
________
________
________
________
________
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
83
Needs Attention or Improvement Area and Criteria IV.
Responsive Services (continued) J.
The Program evaluates the degree to which counselor time in the area of responsive services matches that which best meets the assessed needs o the total student population.
Operating Sufficiently Well
Exceptionally Well Done
________
________
________
K.
The Program maintains a list of community referral agencies or persons and uses them as part of the comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
________ L.
Other Total Number of Check Marks Expressed in % Suggestions to improve this area ______________________________________________ ______________________________________________ V. System Support A.
The Program spends the predetermined amount of time on the System Support component.
B.
The Program maintains a well organized and functional guidance information center.
C.
The Program submits and maintains a guidance program budget that is separate from the school's for administration.
D. Counseling staff members meet periodically with the administrators to monitor or evaluate the effectiveness of the comprehensive guidance program.
________ ______%
________ ________ ______% Timeline:
________ ________ ______%
____________________ ____________________
________ ________
________ ________
________ ________
________
________
________
________
________
________ 84
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
Needs Attention or Improvement Area and Criteria V. System Support (continued) E.
The Program helps provide orientation to students and in-service programs for teachers.
F.
The Program's assistance in performing nonguidance functions do not detract from the guidance and counseling program (e.g., registration of students, administration of standardized tests, keeping of school records, etc.)
G.
The Program conducts a planned program of public relations for staff, parents, and community.
H.
The Program has an active advisory/steering committee that holds periodic meetings and makes recommendations at the planning and evaluation stages of the program.
I.
The Program uses counselors, teachers, and others in ways that allow them to use their special skills.
J.
The Program engages in activities to provide knowledge about and use of community resources, employment opportunities, and the local labor market.
L.
Other Total Number of Check Marks Expressed in % Suggestions to improve this area ______________________________________________ ______________________________________________ ________
Operating Sufficiently Well
Exceptionally Well Done
________
________
________
________
________
________
________
________
________
________
________
________
________
________
________ ________ ______%
________ ________ ______% Timeline:
________ ________ ______%
____________________ ____________________
New Hampshire Implementation Manual for Comprehensive School Guidance and Counseling
85
